Title
Review for Star Trek: First Contact (1996)
Number of Reviews
33

Author
Brian Koller
"First Contact" is the latest in the long-lived series of
"Star Trek" movies, but the first not to include any cast 
members from the original 1960s television series.
The film begins in the 24th century.  The spaceship
"Enterprise" is part of a fleet of Federation (good guys)
ships defending the universe against a Borg invasion (bad guys).
The Borg aim to conquer the universe by converting all
intelligent beings they encounter to Borg form.  This means
that they become part machine, and lose their individuality,
responding only to orders from the Borg Queen (Alice Krige).
The Enterprise must go back in time to the 21st century Earth
to prevent its assimilation by the Borg.  There, they fight
a Borg invasion of their ship, and help Earth resident
Zefram Cochrane (James Cromwell) launch his history flight
that leads to the first encounter with aliens.
I know that I am mostly alone in my dislike of this film.
The movie received critical praise and commercial success,
unlike the "Generations" film that preceded it.  I have
many faults with the film, which I will describe below:
The character Data (Brent Spiner) is an android who looks
completely human except for green pancake makeup.  If he
wants to be more human, why doesn't he wipe it off?
Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) is supposed to be French,
but has a British accent.  When prompted, he can flawlessly 
recite passages from "Moby Dick".  He is fond of grand
statements like "accumulation of wealth in the 24th
century is no longer important."  This is about as
believable as character Geordi's assertion that all
of Earth's problems (poverty, disease, etc) are solved after 
they first encounter aliens.
Worf (Michael Dorn) is an alien from another planet, but he
looks and sounds human except for wearing a mask that is
an apparent castoff from a "Planet of the Apes" movie.
The emphasis is on special effects, makeup and costumes.
This is typified by a scene of the Borg Queen's head and
shoulders lowered by cables onto her waiting body.  What
is the point of this except to impress the naive, the
equivalent of an exploding car in an action movie.
Worf, a Klingon warrior, whines about zero gravity making 
his stomach upset.  This leads a lengthy spacewalking scene 
where Picard, Worf and a doomed noname battle the Borg to blow 
up a beacon.  The Borg are kind enough to fight only one or two 
at a time while the rest hang around listlessly.  Worf has his 
space suit punctured but this has no effect on him.
In many scenes, Picard and other crew walk past Borg who ignore
them.  Picard says that they are safe as long as the Borg don't
view them as a threat.  This doesn't jive with the Borg goals:
of course they would pick off strays.
The Borg try to assimilate Data.  Picard is captured and
taken to Data, who is now an apparent Borg confederate.
Data makes several remarks to demonstrate he is now a bad guy.
It eventually turns out that Data was never converted, and
turns the tables on the Borg.  Why didn't he do that earlier
in the scene?  It is an artificial contrivance to extend
dramatic tension.  At the movie's end, the Enterprise has
been repaired, but Data still has his faceplate off.

Author
johnnyp@curry.lcs.mit.edu
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
|| This week's movie: "Star Trek: First Contact"
\/ CW loved it. So why the Down Arrow? It was over too damn quick! Now CW's
   gotta wait two and a half years for another one!
What a difference a good director makes (and a decent script that stays off
the net)! Instead of ST:G's only-for-regular-viewers hodgepodge clunkiness,
with Lursa and B'Etor, Picard's brother and nephew's death, Data's emotion
chip, Enterprise-D's crash, and, oh yeah, *Kirk's death* all competing for
attention, we get a story that's, to CW's surprise, more intimate than epic.
We only see maybe a dozen Borg, and now they're personified by their Queen.
That's a change from the faceless unstoppable enemy in "BOBW". But what
makes this as good as ST:The Wrath of Khan is that, like TWOK, the story
comes down to a battle of wills and a battle against the self. There are
many loose parallels between Kirk-Spock-Khan and Picard-Data-Queen. Similar
themes of friendship and obsession are woven in. Melville replaces Dickens.
But what puts First Contact over the top was the astonishingly crisp, lavish
execution in scene after scene (esp. "The Big Goodbye", on the hull, and in
the final struggle in engineering). So crisp, it moved just a bit *too*
fast...CW wanted to savor the moments a little longer. After all, when CW's
got to wait years between Star Trek films, CW wants to see a 4-hour movie
featuring a cast of thousands! Rest assured, The Franchise is safe for now.
/\ Picard
|| Defeating the Borg? No big deal. Calling Worf "coward" and getting away with
   it? Now *that's* impressive! Next movie, Picard calls Mike Tyson a "sissy".
/\ Data
|| Someone get it through this lunkhead's metal skull that humanity ain't what
   it's cracked up to be! *You* try going 8 yrs. w/out sex as a *real* human!
/\ Worf
|| His "kill you where you stand" line rocked, but how about *this* comeback:
   "Go stuff a croissant in your pants, Frenchy! You friggin' baldheaded jerk!"
/\ Lily
|| Who's this Alfre Woodward? Boy she can act! CW's never seen her before
   cuz she acts in Really Smart Films that are too hard for CW to follow!
/\ Cochrane
|| Lewd, profane, and pigheaded. Roddenberry must be rolling over like mad!
   Good thing they got Cromwell...CW heard Howard Stern was 2nd for the part!
/\ Borg Queen
|| Y'know, CW liked those cute little ears of hers. CW'd go out with her...
   but only if she promises not to assimilate mankind on the first date.
/\ Riker
|| Notice how he's all smiles in just about every scene he's in? Forget the
   assimilation of humanity..you'd smile too if you were directing a Trek film!
/\ Troi
|| It's tough being Trek's 19th banana, but hey, she oughta be thankful!
   Ya don't see CW getting a drunk scene in any $100,000,000 grossing films!
/\ Geordi
|| Damn, he looked good in those Oakleys! *Big* improvement over the barette!
   But handled the real Zepham Cochrane about as well as the real Leah Goldman.
/\ Beverly Crusher
|| Blink and you'll miss her, but we do see her "special" relationship with
   Picard in play...like her "Jean-Luc" soothe when he loses it on the bridge.
/\ Holo-Doc
|| One of the things that sucks about r.a.s.c. it's too easy to get tipped
   off about surprises like this one! Still, a very shrewd, self-aware gag.
/\ Wesley Crusher
|| He gets an up arrow for *not* showing up! Bwah hah hah! (btw, Wil Wheaton's
   making a comeback in Robin William's "Absent-Minded Professor" this summer).
/\ Jerry Goldsmith
|| A surprisingly restrained, majestic main theme. Almost something you'd
   expect for a historical ship movie about whale hunting or something...
|| Berman
\/ "A Rick Berman Production"? How about "A Rick Berman Ego"? Enjoy your damn
   $100,000,000 gross! (By the way, Voyager better not suck next week!)

Author
Mark Farinas
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Star Trek: First Contact is not only the worst movie of the series,
but one of the worst movies ever made. Its worthy of MST3K in every way,
shape and form. A movie for the masses? Even if it wasn't a Trek movie
it would be horrid. Want to know why? Those who loved this movie and
those who hated it should read on and respond through e-mail and
posting. Flame or respond intelligently, I don't care!
   Let it be known I love Trek. I love TOS and TNG. I, however, hated
the last movie and this one even more. I went with two other friends to
the largest screen we could find. When the words "A Rick Berman
Production" came on we all booed and hissed. First Contact opened with a
very disturbing dream sequence showing Picard and his trials during his
assimilation in Best of Both Worlds. This was done exactly like Ripple's
dream in the beginning of Aliens. Not too original, and overly graphic.
It actually scared me. But FC goes totally downhill from here. The plot
advances so quickly its hard to really keep up with without your head
spinning a bit.
   This is why I say it's a bad movie period. It was put together
horribly. One thing lead to another and another without taking time to
breath. The plot moves at warp 10. We get the warning of the Borg
invasion, then we spend 30 seconds thinking about how dumb SF is for not
allowing the E-E to join the battle (which was idiotic saying its SF's
newest ship armed with the newest weapons and a crew that has saved
Earth quite a few times in the past). Then 10 seconds more to make the
decision to go to earth (all the way to Earth from the Neutral Zone in
time to save the day? This should have taken weeks, but this is a shit
movie, right?).
   Now we witness the biggest battle in Trek history. We've all been
waiting for it: tonnes of Fed ships against a Borg cube. We missed it at
Wolf 359, but now the time is here. It lasts 30 more seconds of the
movie. We are 2 minutes into the movie and all this has already
transpired. I cant take it! The battle is ended because Picard knows
some kind of weakness in the cube that he doesn't explain. Why should
he? It would slow the plot to warp 8. And why didn't he point this spot
out to the E-D crew in BOBW? Would have been cooler than the stupid
"sleep" resolution they came up with that ended TNG's best episode
rather sloppily. But the ending of this battle was even more sloppy and
was ended this way to advance the so called plot faster.
   And now it gets really silly. A Borg escape craft easily hurls itself
into the past with yet another of Trek's many tachyon pulse things. The
Borg can do that? Then why bother fighting for any world? Why go to the
21st century? Why not go back to primordial times? Rewrite the hole
universe in their image straight from its beginnings on!? Why not have
done that a long ass time ago? Well, the E-E is sucked in after it and
blows the crap out of it with the new DS9 invention, "quantum
torpedoes". This is, of course, another stupid way of getting the term
"quantum" into the show. "Quantum this and that" I'm sick of it.
   But all the E-E's vital functions are off-line due to the time travel
and they have no idea the Borg have invaded the ship. This is know do to
a number of idiotic scenes that were ripped from every horror movie ever
made. I laughed my ass off when the first two crew members got it. It
was that stupid.
   Meanwhile, on the surface we meat Zephram Cochrane. Remember him in
"Metamorphosis"? Remember how moral and upright he was? How clean cut?
Well, he's a drunken capitalistic bastard here. He wants nothing but
naked women, money, and power. He's also now from Montana. Why? Because
Berman Trek is geocentric. Cochrane was originally from Alpha Centauri
and we can all guess that, since Alpha Centauri is Sol's closest
neighbor, the ACs probably came and visited us. Why the hell not? But
not for Berman and Braga, those twits. Yeah, and the original
Enterprise's main engineering was in the secondary hull even though that
big, red "hall way" with the grill over it was obviously the impulse
engines! Thhhhpppptt!
   And where'd he get the dilithium? It isn't a synthetic material. You
mine it out of the ground. As far as I can tell, there is none on Earth.
The fact is, a man doesn't take the leap Cochrane did from go nowhere
alcoholic to goody two shoes. It don't work. If that Cochrane had been
trapped on a planet for a hundred years with anything he wanted it would
have been booze, not a fig tree. Thus Cochrane becomes an antihero.
   Back to the Borg threat, we find that the Borg have not only invaded,
but redecorated. This looks so much like Aliens its not funny. Right
down to Borg coming out of the walls. Not only that but they came out of
these silly Borg Craftmatic Adjustable Reclining Beds with Goofy
Sparking Electrical Headrests. And where'd they get the parts to do
this? Did they excrete it out their mechanical poop shoots? And they are
also assimilating bits of the crew. With what? How'd they get all this
stuff aboard with out being noticed immediately? HOW? This is a lot of
freaking equipment here!
   Data has been captured and is being seduced by the disappointingly
simple looking Borg Queen. Now the Borg are totally ruined. The concept
of this single, simple creature as the head of this immense force. Not a
super computer or entity, but a lousy, bodiless nit-wit. And what is
such an important person doing on a mission like this? Why isn't she at
home working from afar as any all powerful leader would? Oh, and not
only is she evil, but she's moist and she accessorizes wonderfully. Did
you get a look at the fabulous shade of lipstick she was wearing? It
made the scaly, pale thing even more alluring. Hot stuff!
   Data, of course, gets his emotion chip permanently activated (did I
mention he can turn it off now? I'll give them that as it's been two
years and perhaps he's worked out these bugs). The chip, it seems, not
only gives him emotions, but makes him uncontrollably horny as he is
willing to touch lips with the most grotesque and repulsive woman since
Cher. This image has been permanently burned into my retina as I can
still see it when I close my eyes.
   Data is also getting real skin grafted onto him. I thought he could
already feel. It ain't so hard to make a robot have physical sensation.
Just make certain stimuli send certain messages to the "brain". But the
skin also brings pain, and its got blood in it.
   Picard returns to the E-E and meets up with Cochrane's assistant,
Lilly, who was injured on the planet and had the get medical attention
on board. Together they escape the Borg through the holodeck in a scene
made just so Patrick could pull off a few rounds as an action hero and
allow us to see the Borg get all shot up in slow-mo.
   Now some have said that non-trekkers could not understand this movie
due to its close ties with BOBW and Metamorphosis. But that's just not
so because both of these back stories are explained in laborious detail.
These are actually moments when to plot becomes tedious because to the
Trekker these are givens. Not only that, but they are told in "Babylon
5" style. You know, in B5 every character gives a long monologue about a
tragic part of their history. Just like Picard gives to Lilly about his
assimilation. Oye.
   Picard now no longer gives a flying fuck (yeah I cursed, fuck you)
about his crew, something no other Trek captain has ever done. The
Captain Ahab thing, done to death already in all Trek incarnations, is
reheated to a toasty brown. Picard should be over this part of his life
already as he delt with it in "I, Borg". He had the oppotunity to wipe
them out, he delt with his rage and hatred, and he conquered it with
reason and compasion. Why bring it back now? He actually kills one of
his own men who is in the process of Instant Assimilation, a grotesque
and unforgivable action. He also dissects a Borg that was one of his own
crew with out even flinching and learns the Borg's plan of using the
deflector dish to tell the 21st century Borg to attack Earth now.
   Picard, Worf, and Lt. Hawk (who was said to be the next "Lt. Saavik")
put on EVA suits and go out to get the Borgs working on the dish. Let me
tell you right now, I hate this new E-E. It is a cheap cut and paste of
the Voyager's primary hull, the Excelcior's secondary hull, and the
E-A's nacelle struts. It was so totally unoriginal it was sick. Not only
that, but the external shots looked like crap. This was the ship that
looked the most like a model. I expected to see a string at any moment.
It was painted in dayglow colours too. Red, yellow, blue and bright,
bright white. The amount of detail in this model was not worthy of a
motion picture.
   This was overly noticeable as the three crew men trekked (oh, did I
mention how stupid and trite I thought Cochrane's "some kind of Star
Trek" line was?) over the ship's hull. They finally stumble upon the
Borg who are putting together some transmitter in the middle of the
dish. Lucky for the crew this particular portion of the ship can be
easily ejected. Does the whole ship come apart like this? Or was this
just a moronic, useless function that was added just for this scene?
I'll pick the second. This was plain dumb. This whole scene could have
been totally cut and other portions of the movie, like the whole opening
sequence, lengthened.
   As if this is not stupid enough, the crew is attacked in zero-g and
merriment ensues. Worf carries his Mek'leth with him everywhere it
seems. Picard does a cute jump across the dish. This was the STUPIDEST
part of the movie. Picard floating over the deflector was hilarious, and
I totally lost it. I could actually see the part of the suit were the
string was attached pulled slightly outward. Yes, I admit it, I wet 'um.
Then Hawk is attacked by a Borg and thought dead until he reappears and
attacks Picard because he's been subject to Instant Assimilation. Yep,
without his pressure suit being disturbed and without any equipment the
Borg got all these funny mechanical doo-hickies on his face and he's
turned against the captain. Do we care what happens next?
   The Borg, BTW, are not wearing any protective outfits outside.
Remember this for later. It will come up again.
   Worf and Picard get back in the ship when they find that they have to
destroy the ship to stop the Borg because phasers no longer have any
effect at all. But Picard, being the antihero that he is, refuses to let
go of the ship. So he decides he's going to doom himself and his crew.
And you know what? No one cares! We're gonna blindly go to our deaths!
Crusher doesn't debate him and says "If that's his orders we have to
follow them". Like hell! You're the doctor! Pronounce him unfit for
command! Either that or talk him out of it! Your Bev! He loves you! You
know him better than anyone else. How many times have you said
"Jean-Luc! I disagree!"  But no, this new character, Lilly has that job.
Yep, someone Picard just met totally turns his whole outlook around
using the Ahab argument. She then admits she's never read Mobey Dick and
you can feel all the Beaver and Buckwheats in the cinema thinking "See!
I don't gotta read ta be smart!"
   Abandon ship! The ship is on autodestruct and everybody's running for
their lives! Everyone but Picard who is gonna go save Data. That's
right, you forgot about Data, didn't you? At the same time, Cochrane is
admitting what an ass he is in B5 style to Riker who pollutes the
timeline even more by even telling the man quotes he'll make up in the
future. They then fly off into the sky and seeing the earth from above
convinces Cochrane what an ass he is. Gee another instant
transformation. The second one in as many minutes. Cochrane has to go to
warp fast to attract the attention of the Vulcans doing a survey mission
near by to come land on Earth.
   In engineering Picard shows up to find Data and stop the Borg single
handedly. It seems Data is one of them now and allows the Borg access
the main computer and stops the autodestruct system. He then fires
"Quantum" torpedoes at the Phoenix. These are the slowest moving
torpedoes in the history of Trek. This wasn't even a dramatic slow-mo
effect. It was in real time. The torpedoes miss and it turns out that
Data's really a good guy. He then smashes his fist through a coolant
chamber releasing freezing gas. Picard jumps up and hangs on to the
ceiling as the gas freezes and shatters the Borg's organic parts. Now,
think about this. The vacuum of space is 3 Kelvin. The Borg were
outside, unprotected, in space, and this didn't effect them at all. If
the Borg don't need oxygen, pressure and heat to survive, then why
bother with having environmental systems on their ships?
   But this coolant gets 'em. By this time Picard's uniform is ripped to
shreds and is totally sleeveless. He then swings on a bit of tubing to
land on the other side of the room and has as the gas sucked out of the
room. Picard sleeveless and swinging? What the fuck is going on here?
That is so Predator/Terminator/Aliens/Rambo/any other action movie you
can think of. This is Picard as his lowest.
   The Phoenix goes into warp, faster than light, and stays there for
five whole minutes. So fast, stars streak by. Mind you, it takes 8
minutes to get to Jupiter at light speed. But when they come out of it
they seem to be no further than the Moon's orbit away (judging from the
size of Earth when they looked back at it after the jump). Does anyone
else see a problem with this?
   The Vulcans detect the warp field and they come a running. They pick
up the warp field, but not the four massively powerful projectiles fired
in the same area. A weapon so potent it destroyed a Borg ship. If I was
a Vulcan, I'd wet myself, turn around, and hope my ass wasn't spotted by
who ever fired those shots. Cochrane introduces them to cheap booze and
cheesy mock 1960's retro music. The E-E goes back to there time period
which is totally unchanged, which is suprising as I'd think Riker or
Jeordi would have told Cochrane something totally history shattering
(yeah, as if they haden't already).
   Hey, how'd they get back? They used the same shit as the Borg. Yeah,
the same damn shit. I swore again. I'm that mad. Will it be that easy
from now on? Can they do this all the time? If something bad happens,
can they go back a day and fix it? Can Rick Berman and Brannon Braga go
back in time to stop Gene from creating TOS and convince him to work,
instead, on the plots for Deep Space Nine and Voyager? Can they, huh
huh? Of course not, this technology will be forgotten right away. And
why did Lavar Berton throw a fit and not wear the visor in this movie?
He was only on screen for about five minutes of the entire movie.
   All in all, this movie sucked. Generations was pretty damn bad, but
this was even worse. The worst Trek movie ever made! One of the worst
action movies ever made. It was dull, unbelievable, and seemed like it
was slapped together in a hurry. I could have made a better movie than
this. Hell, I could make a better series than the two Bs have. Come on
people! Let's end Star Trek for a few years! Maybe in a decade or two
some new, better producers will take up the cause. Hell, maybe it'll be
me when university's over. Flame on!

Author
Laurie D. T. Mann
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Prediction:  Jonathan Frakes will be the first former
Star Trek cast member to win an Oscar for best direction.
Though he won't win for Star Trek 8, he'll go on to do
impressive work in the future.  Frakes' sure direction
and the wonderful ensemble acting of Star Trek 8 carry 
the movie.  Sure to the past trend, the even-numbered
Star Trek movies continue to blow the odd-numbered movies
out of the water.
Using the Borg as the big screen bad-guys was a good idea,
but mixing in two Star Trek cliches in the movie (time
travel and another I choose not to mention here) could have
come close to sinking the ship.  That said, if the Star
Trek writers were going
to dabble in the past again, why not "resurrect" Zeframe
Cochran (a radically different Zeframe Cochran from the
one present 30 years ago, but... ;-> ), the man who both
invented warp drive and initiated Earth's first contact
with aliens?  The view of mid-20th century Earth as
dystopia was kind of depressing, but not nearly so bad as
assimilation plan the Borg wanted to unleash.
The Borg go back to the past to prevent Cochran from launching
his primative warp drive ship, and, of course, the crew of the
Enterprise follow along to stop them.
At one point, pretty early in the movie, it almost
looks like the Enterprise has everything under control.
While the Borg damaged Cochran's test ship
the Enterprise destroyed a Borg ship and found Cochran's
test ship (cleverly built in an
abandoned missle silo).  However, the Borg had managed 
to sneak onboard and start assimilating the 
Enterprise and its crew.  That leaves Picard, Data,
Crusher, Worf and some "red shirts" on the Enterprise to
duke it out with the Borg, and Riker, Troi and Geordie
on the Earth to find Cochran and make sure his damaged warp
ship takes off as planned.
The acting is just great, including James Cromwell (Babe, and
some STNG episodes) and Alfre Woodard (Cross Creek, Grand Canyon).
Woodard does more with her eyes than many actors can do with
their whole faces.  Another great bit of casting was Alice 
Krige as the Borg queen, as malicious a character as Star Trek
writers have ever created.  When I reviewed Generations two years
ago, I said:
   Generations lurches off your screen with lots of destroyed
space        ships, massive plot holes, and a few really great scenes
mixed 
   in just to make it frustrating. Patrick Stewart and Brent Spiner 
   are so good it's like they're in another movie. All the women      
characters are completely and frustratingly wasted.
   The direction is also wildly erratic....
This time, everyone in the cast is terrific, though Stewart and
Spiner still outshone the other actors.  The female crew 
members were a  little stronger, but I still would like to see 
more of Sirtis and MacFadden in a Star Trek movie.
While I found the plot a little stupid, it was a more logical story
than Generations, and the dialog was sharp. My plot quibbles 
might be more because I've seen so much Star Trek and read so
much science fiction over the years.  I'm
not sure if a "novice viewer" would have more plot quibbles or
fewer.  To their credit, the writers did turn almost ever
Star Trek cliche they used on its ear, particularly in a climatic
scene late in the film between Woodard and Stewart.  And many
scenes used in the trailers and commercials were taken out of
context in an unusual fashion - the movie would then go off in
a wholly different and wonderful direction.
As with most Star Trek movies, there are wonderful comic
bits that are fun, but these didn't ruin the flow of the movie.
The special effects, particularly the opening shot in the movie,
are just first-rate. 
This movie is definitely worth your time, and rates a strong
8 on the IMDB rating scale.
I hope that when they start to write the next Star Trek movie
that they think about creating an original story, and one
without time travel.  Between all the time travel in this
movie and in the recent TV shows, it's a science fiction cliche
I'd like to see less of.  
-- 
*** Laurie D. T. Mann ** lmann@city-net.com ***
******* http://www.city-net.com/~lmann ********
**** Please note new E-mail and home page *****

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Patrick Stewart; Jonathan Frakes; Brent Spiner & LeVar Burton
Star Trek: First Contact is the eighth movie in the series based on Gene
Roddenberry's TV show from the sixties. It is the second movie featuring the
cast of Star Trek: The Next Generation.
First Contact is one of the best movies in the series, and it seems to hold
up the tradition of the even numbered movies being far superior to their odd
numbered counterparts.
Unlike the other films in the series, this is the first one where no members
of the original cast of Star Trek appear. (Except for Majel Barret, as the
voice of the Enterprise's computer.)
In this latest installment, the crew as forced to travel back in time to
prevent the Borg (more about them in a second) from changing the course of
Earth's history. It seems the Borg want to prevent the first warp flight.
For those of you out there that aren't familiar with the Borg, they are half
biological, half mechanical beings that assimilate other races and transform
them into Borg.
This is usually not a pleasant experience, what with all the mechanical
parts being implanted into the victim. As far as villains go, since being
introduced on Star Trek: The Next Generation, the Borg have become on of the
most popular villains in Star Trek.
The special effects in this latest effort are among the best in a Star Trek
film. As are the sets for the new Enterprise. In the tradition of the TV
series Star Trek: The Next Generation, the main cast does their usual superb
job. The "guest stars" of the film include Alice Krige as the Borg's queen,
and James Cromwell as Zefram Cockran, the man who is to make the historic
first warp flight. Cromwell, in my humble opinion, steals every scene he is
in. As usual, there is the normal humor associated with Star Trek, although
most of it is inside jokes that would go right over the head of non Star
Trek fans.
Generally, a great film that both diehard Trek fans and your average movie p
atron will enjoy.

Author
Brian Lehr
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Written by: Ronald D. Moore and Brannon Braga (screenplay)
Directed by:Jonathan Frakes
   Wow, looks like everybody is taking a crack at review this movie, so I
might as well throw in my half a cent or so.
   I will be the first to admit that I went to the theater with a
considerable amount of anxiety, most of it caused by the messages
prevalent on this newsgroup  in the week before the movie opened.  "It
sucked" or "It's a dog" seemed to be the general idea of most of these
foreboding reviews.  Well, I'm here to say..."yeah, right!"  Sure, that's
somewhat immature.  But so am I.
   This movie did just about everything _but_ suck.  It sorta had that
"Aliens" thing goin' with just the right amount of humor (mostly from the
planet scenes) to keep it from falling into the abyss of seriousness.  The
performances were great, especially the ranting and raving Stewart.  Don't
think I've ever seen him so ticked off.  The guest cast was good; Cromwell
and Woodard caright up with our pals from the century.  The FX were
amazing; during some scenes (ie. that Borg Queen attachment, the zero-g
walk, the zoomout at the start, etc.) I was just wondering "How'd they do
that? How'd they do that?"  And surprise, surprise!  Frakes can direct!
   Everyone else has done their little comprehensive review of the movie,
but I'm a rebel.  I'm also pretty tired.  So here's a few thinngs that
stick out in my mind:
-The cameos.  All great, though I had to explain to some of my friends
that "that one guy" was Neelix.
-Lt. Hawk(e).  Wow...you really could tell he was GAY, couldn't you???
The way he dressed up in women's clothing and pranced around, that was so
HOMOSEXUAL of him!  Man, that guy was so damn GAY I was distracted every
scene he ws in!
-The Borg are really quick workers now, aren't they?  Just squirt a little
Borg juice into you, and you're toast.
-Ok, I'm not one to get all picky about technical deatils and continuity,
but one thing really bugged me.  How could the Borg have "assimilated
decks 11 through 26" if there's only 24 decks?  That's what Picard tells
Lily!!!  I guess  I should pass it off to his mind being clouded by
revenge...
-That thing jumping out of Picard's face at the beginning.  Cool.
-The Hot Tamales I had were really bad.  Tasted like bananas or
something...ick.
   And I've never reviewed a ST movie before, so I guess it's a manditory
thing to put "the order" (of films I liked).  Ok, sure: 2 and 8 (tie), 6,
7, 4, 3, 1 and 5 (tie).  Now feel free to discount my opinion.
0.0-3.5  What was that all about?  I'm embarrassed to be watching.
3.6-5.0  Yawn.  Could have been much, much better.
5.1-6.5  A few good parts, but mostly a snoozer.
6.6-7.5  Watch it.  You may like it.  Or you may not.
7.6-8.5  Not too shabby.
8.6-9.3  Good movie.  A keeper.
9.4-9.9  The best of the bunch.  These are the ones you can tell your
friends that don't even like Star trek to watch.
10.0!!!  Never happened in my lifetime...but you never know!
http://www.teleport.com/~snorfle/index.html 

Author
Yamamoto
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Have you noticed that right after you get your clothes back from dry
cleaners, they attract stains?  And only for first week or so.  Then
you never spill anything on the dirty clothes again.  I swear there
must be a conspiracy going on around here.  I bet the dry cleaners
add stain attracting chemicals on your clothes that last about a week
or so.  Of course, if you keep it in the closet, it won't attract dirt until
you first put it on again.
Speaking of conspiracies, STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT came
out so I had to go check it out.  It's the latest of the Star Trek movie
series.  This time around, the Federation's arch enemy come
knocking on the front door so of course Star Trek: The New
Generation crew must come to the rescue.  And they go through the
trekkie techno babble along the way just to save not only earth but
the whole world as we know it.
No nakkid boobs.  33 bullets.  Ship loads of dead bodies.  32 on the
vomit meter.  No moon shots.  What we got here are:  attack of the
killer borg-fu, drill to the eye-fu, implant-fu, dreams from hell-fu,
attack of killer comet-fu, targetting of non essential area-fu, techno
babble-fu, futile resistance-fu, ankle grab-fu, attack of bullet proof
body-fu, touchy feeling-fu,  tequila shots-fu, bad whisky-fu, and of
course, more techno babble-fu.  Video hall of fame nominations to: 
James Cromwell for saying stuff like  "Engage" and to Alice Krige
for saying stuff like "You strive to be imperfect?" and to Brent
Spiner for saying stuff like "You mean sexually?"  Of course to
Gates McFadden for saying stuff like "captain has made his
decision" and to Alfre Woodard for saying stuff like "captain Ahab"
and to Michael Dorn for saying stuff like "it made me sick to my
stomach".  And we can never forget Marina Sirtis for saying stuff
like "This is a primitive society" and to Patrick Stewart for saying
stuff like "I will make them pay!" and to Jonathan Frakes for saying
stuff like "you mean you told him" and to Levar Burton for saying
stuff like "that's funny".  Three and a half stars.  Shaggy Bob says
wicked!
Spoilers -- Another one of the Borg ship heads to earth to assimilate. 
Jean Luc is placed out of the loop because the higher up things he's a
liability.  Of course, he proves all the higher ups wrong and saves
the day.   In defeat, escaping Borg ship time travels and attack earth
in the past.  Hmm... didn't Cyberdine System 101 and T1000 try to
do something like that?  Anyhow, the Enterprise and her crew
follows and prevents altering of time line and saves the world from
being conquered by the Borg.  All the cameo by people from the
different series adds flavor to the flick.  But you really do need to
follow the TV series to fully appreciate the little quirks and inside
humor.
If you're waiting for the phone call from Paulina Porizkova, take the
cell phone and go see this movie.  If you follow Star Trek at all, I
doubt I'll even have to say that.
Alien Alert!  Why do politicians like to make people's lives
difficult?  And why do we elect these people who try their darnest to
make our lives miserable?  For example, the another freeway is
coming down but may not be replaced.  Gee, that makes spending
what, extra 40 min on the surface road instead of extra 20 min the
commuters spend now.  And if there were freeway system as it was
furst intended, we would be saving all that time for something more
constructive than sitting in the car, getting aggrivated by the BMW
who just cut you off.  No wonder people go postal.
For wisdom according to Shaggy Bob, hit that reply key now.

Author
Michael Redman
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
The "Star Trek" audience applauded wildly at the familiar figures,
spectacular special effects and blazing action scenes. Anticipation was
high for more of the same.
And then the "Star WARS" preview ended.
It might have been a tactical error to preview the re-release of the
Lucas trilogy just before the new Trek film. Movies about the Enterprise
crew tend to be slower moving and more methodical in their approach:
something of a disappointment in the sf action arena when compared to
Luke Skywalker and his buddies.
In this outing, the Federation starship must defeat the evil Borg who
have traveled into Earth=92s past to prevent the heavy-drinking
heavy-partying warp drive inventor from making first contact with a
friendly alien race. This will supposedly make it possible for the Borg
to assimilate our planet in their present.
This is the first Trek film without a single member of the original crew
on hand and featuring the new Enterprise E. No James T. Kirk to romance
the alien babes, no Spock to save the day, no Bones to proclaim "I'm a
doctor, not a quantum mechanic!" Instead we have the next generation
crew with a younger and hipper look. =
Some of the new cast look great on the big screen, especially Jean Luc
Picard (Patrick Steward who, oddly enough for being a Trek regular, is
in reality an actor) and Data (Brent Spiner), but the
Spectacular-Looking Award goes to the Borg. The cyborgs have always been
the creepiest of the Star Trek bad guys and they captivate the visual
aspect of the movie. The queen Borg (Alice Krige) is the perfect mixture
of exotic eroticism and lethal danger.
But the rest of the Borg, as cool as they look, just don't work as
menaces. Their method of attack is to lumber towards the enemy and
subdue him hand-to-hand so that he can become a new member of the hive.
The slow moving approach combined with Picard and crew waltzing through
huge numbers of Borg without even being noticed doesn't exactly create a
sense of excitement. They remind me of the zombies in "Brunch Of The
Living Dead" -- "Oh no, there=92s a Borg 50 feet away! We=92d better star=
t
to run in a half hour or so!"
The entire film runs as slowly as the Borg. There are not many highs or
lows in the level of action. Everything moves forward at the same
pondering pace.
Much of the movie must be a mystery to non-Trek fans. Picard's previous
experience with the hive (which changed mysteriously from a collective)
is underexplained. The holo-suite scene appears out of nowhere without a
background.
In terms of Trek films, this is one of the better ones: it's fun to see
the guys in another adventure; but when you compare it to other movies,
there's nothing spectacular. When the original series was on television,
we used to wonder what they could do with a huge budget on the big
screen. Now we know.
They make another "Star Trek" episode.
[This appeared in the 12/5/96 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at mredman@bvoice.com]

Author
Jamahl Epsicokhan
Foreword: This review is a little later than I had hoped for, but I finally
have it done. Beware the length; it's quite long, the longest review I've
ever written. There's also a lot of synopsis in this review, because I felt
compelled to describe the plot in detail in my analysis. With that said...
Warning: This review contains extreme spoilers for the TNG feature film,
"Star Trek: First Contact." If you haven't seen the film yet then proceed
only at your own risk.
Nutshell: Very good stuff. Probably the best of all Trek films, with an
involving story and a skillful, even-handed approach.
Story by Rick Berman & Brannon Braga & Ronald D. Moore
Screenplay by Brannon Braga & Ronald D. Moore
Produced by Rick Berman
Directed by Jonathan Frakes
"Someone once said, 'Don't try to be a great man, just be a man, and let
history make its judgment'."
"That's rhetorical nonsense. Who said that?"
"You did, ten years from now."
   -- William Riker and Zefram Cochrane
--------------------
"Star Trek: First Contact" is one of the best Star Trek films--probably
*the* best Trek film--definitely the most even-handed. It successfully
balances just about every element I believe a good Trek film should
have--superior production and special effects, plenty of humor and fun,
involving conflicts and problems that must be overcome, and a compelling
story with human themes and values consistent with Gene Roddenberry's
optimistic vision. All of it is wrapped into a very neat package of plotting
and pacing. It's good Star Trek, and it's good cinema.
As an added bonus, "First Contact" brings back the Borg, perhaps the most
interesting and menacing race of villains in the history of Trek. Ever since
their introduction in TNG's second season episode "Q Who," the Borg have
been the most compelling threat to the Federation. In that episode, they
were simply hungry for any technology that was different and new.
Negotiation was not a factor; they wanted your stuff, they were without a
doubt bigger and stronger, their hive-like collective was overwhelming, and
if you resisted them, they would destroy you.
A little more than a year later in "The Best of Both Worlds," the writers
clarified another element of the Borg that made them even more
terrifying--the fact that they wanted not only your technology but also
*you*--they wanted to turn you into a mindless drone, to strip you of your
individuality and add you to their single-minded collective. Unlike the
relatively boring and simple-minded aliens of "Independence Day," who simply
wanted to destroy everyone and everything in their path, the Borg instead
threaten you with a fate worse than death: Their goal is to absorb people
and technology and forcibly make you one of them, so that you will become
one in their hive of conquerors.
That Borg ship was destroyed, but not before they assimilated Captain Picard
into their collective and stripped him of his individuality, which was only
regained after the cunning intervention of the Enterprise crew. Now the Borg
have returned, and they're again bent on doing whatever it takes to
assimilate Earth.
"First Contact" opens with a powerful and magnificent-looking shot--part of
a flashback dream sequence that begins as an extreme close-up of Captain
Picard's eyeball, and then tracks back to reveal Picard standing in a Borg
module on a Borg ship. The camera continues to track backward for what seems
like miles, showing what must be millions of Borg drones on the massive
vessel collective--of which Picard has forcibly become part of. Picard
suddenly awakens in his ready room aboard the new Sovereign-class
Enterprise-E, which, we learn, has been in service for nearly a year now.
A message comes through from Starfleet Command. The Borg have been
identified in Federation space, and they're on a direct course for Earth;
and as Picard states, this time there may be no stopping them. Further,
Starfleet orders Picard away from the battle--they fear his past
assimilation by the Borg may instigate an unstable element to an
already-volatile situation.
Well, no points for guessing that once the Borg start pounding on the
Starfleet ships and the losses start rolling in Picard takes it upon himself
to violate direct orders and engage the Enterprise in battle. What's
surprising here is the speed with which the film launches itself. Unlike in
"Generations" two years ago, little time is wasted here on old jokes or the
reintroduction of the TNG cast (a nature of the film keeps the plot taut and
should actually increase accessibility for non-Trekkers). Within ten minutes
of the opening credits, the Enterprise is in the heat of battle with the
immense Borg cube--as is the Defiant, commanded by Worf, apparently ordered
to the battlefield as part of a reinforcement effort.
I must say, seeing a Trek battle of this magnitude on the big
screen--especially with that huge Borg ship--is a sight that probably alone
is worth the price of admission. It looks great. Particularly attractive are
the organic motions of the Defiant, which flies around the screen with such
graceful, eye-pleasing movements that it makes war look almost like
choreography.
Perhaps one negative aspect about the initial battle with the Borg is that
it ends a little too abruptly and easily. As Starfleet's resident expert on
the Borg and their weaknesses, Picard orders the fleet to concentrate their
fire on a specific point, which destroys the Borg cube in a nifty
pyrotechnic display. But this victory transpires a little more easily than
it really should have--especially considering Picard's aforementioned notion
that "this time there may be no stopping them." By beating the Borg in five
minutes under only partially explained circumstances, the threat feels a
little less real than I hoped it would have, not up to the level of the Borg
assault on Earth back in "Best of Both Worlds."
But there's a flip side to this coin. Like I said, "First Contact" wastes
very little time--the pace of the movie is pretty fast, and once the Borg
cube is destroyed and the damaged Defiant crew is beamed aboard the
Enterprise, the main plot takes off. You see, just before it explodes, the
Borg cube launches a smaller sphere which creates a "temporal matrix" that
allows it to travel back to the latter half of 21st century. While in
pursuit, the Enterprise is caught in a temporal wake, and upon realizing
that the Borg intend to change history by assimilating Earth in the past,
Picard decides he must follow the Borg back and prevent such an occurrence.
Okay, so it's Yet Another Time Travel Plot. Time travel can be dangerous
territory in terms of plausibility, because it sets up the possibility of
the all-encompassing Time Paradox. Fortunately, the film steers clear of
most of the technobabble and confusion, and wisely delves into its story.
Still, time travel has been done on Trek so many times ("Star Trek IV,"
"Generations," and numerous episodes of TOS, TNG, DS9, and Voyager),
sometimes without success. There are a few things about "First Contact's"
logic of time travel that annoy me, like, for example, how time suddenly
became something that the Borg could manipulate at will, and how the
Enterprise reconfigures the time matrix at the end of the film to get back
to their time period. Such complaints are minor, however--the importance
here is the story once the movie goes into the past, which easily makes the
ends justify the means.
The Borg and the Enterprise arrive at Earth, April 4, 2063--shortly after
the widespread destruction of World War III that leaves the planet
particularly susceptible to an invasion; but, more importantly, as the crew
quickly notes, this date is the day before the historic "first contact"
between humans and intelligence beyond the solar system, which is supposed
to take place when Zefram Cochrane (James Cromwell), the Montana-based
inventor of warp drive among humans, takes a test flight in his
revolutionary space craft, to the interest of some extra-terrestrials who
are passing near Earth's star system.
The Borg want to prevent first contact and assimilate humanity, but the
Enterprise intervenes and destroys the Borg sphere. Before the loss of their
ship, however, the Borg are able to beam a small invasion party aboard the
Enterprise, and begin assimilating the ship and its crew like a cancer from
the inside.
>From here, the story divides into three narratives. One involves Picard,
Worf, and the Enterprise crew's efforts to contain the Borg from taking over
the ship. A second centers around Data, who is kidnapped by the Borg during
a confrontation and taken to the lower decks they control where they attempt
to assimilate him into their collective under the command of an element new
to Borg milieu--the Borg Queen (Alice Krige), a single entity who represents
the mind behind a massive collective of drones. A third follows Riker,
Geordi, and Deanna's attempts to see to it Cochrane's warp flight goes
through as history plans.
The type of movement between different plot lines exercised in "First
Contact" is nothing unfamiliar to Trekkian story structure, but under
Frakes' tempered direction, the plot holds together just fine and scenes
work. Most importantly, the plot proves consistently interesting and the
story remains involving. The key to the film is its big picture--the way it
works all of its elements into a coherent, cohesive whole in which each
development manages to be something both entertaining and relevant.
Picard's fight for the Enterprise takes an understandable and sturdy
character-driven turn--that of vengeance. The motif begins subtly; such
lines as Picard's order, "Don't hesitate to fire on crew members who have
been assimilated," make sense in their context, but also add to the bigger
agenda--that of Picard and his hatred of the Borg for what they do to any
who stand in their path, and--more specifically--what they did to him six
years ago. The vengeance factor present here is deftly executed, thanks in
part to another of Patrick Stewart's convincing performances. But another
important aspect here is in the screenplay's ability to make points about
this theme. For this purpose the writers have a character named Lily Sloane
(Alfre Woodard), Cochrane's 21st century assistant who winds up lost in the
bowels of the Enterprise after a series of events. Sloane is smart, and she
makes some keen observations about Picard's situation, at one point drawing
a very pointed comparison between Picard and Captain Ahab of "Moby Dick."
Woodard's energy is very commendable; she and Stewart work well together in
a host of scenes of varying depth.
It's clear that Picard allows his anger to cloud his judgment, particularly
when he refuses to arm the Enterprise's self-destruct sequence and orders
the futile fight for control of his ship to continue. This throws him into
conflict with Worf in a charged scene filled with fiery words. Conflict is
tough to do amongst the TNG cast, but the filmmakers pull it off here by
making Picard decidedly *wrong* and, further, insulting Worf for trying to
set him right. Based on TNG's history between Worf and Picard, Worf's very
Klingon response to Picard's insults seems sincere: "If you were any other
man, I would kill you where you stand." Pretty startling. (If the later
scene where the two make up seems a tad easy, remind yourself that this is
the TNG cast we're talking about.)
The entire revenge theme speaks for itself much of the time, and it's a
credit to the writers that the film looks at the situation from so many
perspectives. In one way it's easy for us as the audience to hate the Borg
and the relentless strive toward oneness and mass consumption they represent
(especially those of us who so vividly remember Picard's experience in "The
Best of Both Worlds"). On the other hand, many of the Borg now trying to
alter history used to be members of the Enterprise crew, and it's unsettling
to watch Picard barely bat an eye after damn near *enjoying* gunning down a
Borg (in an elaborate holodeck sequence) who used to be one of his own
Ensigns. Of the themes in "First Contact," this is the heaviest and most
complex, and the writers give it the analysis it deserves.
As Picard and the crew attempt to quash the Borg cancer, Data finds himself
in the position Picard was six years ago--on the Borg "operating table,"
where they attempt to turn him into one of them. For some reason, the Borg
take a particular interest in Data; they see him as the key to the human
puzzle that has defeated them once already. There are a host of intriguing
exchanges between Data and the Borg Queen, with some dialog that's really on
the mark. Data's quest for humanity has always been something pervasive on
TNG, but here the dialog reveals another purpose--it underlines the evil in
Borg oneness. Whereas data's quest is a search for his own human
individuality, the Borg simply conquer and force their way of life on
others, in their effort to become a more "perfect" network of drones. And as
Data so rightly points out to the Borg Queen, "to think of oneself as
perfect is often the feat of a delusional mind." The Queen has some retorts
of her own, and knows that Data's quest for human feelings is his weakness
and goes so far as to tempt him closer to the Borg collective with human
flesh, grafting it onto his circuitry for true skin sensations. It's a witty
and ironic approach by the script, that the key to the Borg's removal of
humanity from humans would be in giving Data more distinctly human
characteristics.
The Borg Queen turns out to be one of the film's most interesting
characters, partly in the way the filmmakers realize her--both physically
and mentally--but also because of Krige's skillful rendition of a calm,
seductive personality who aims to simultaneously consume and create Data
anew, as well as humanity along with him. (A particularly nice display of
the Queen's sense of superior tranquillity comes when Data attempts to
escape but freezes in pain when cut on his newfound flesh by Borg drones.
The Queen simply waves her hands and the drones disperse in random
directions, like a group of mindless insects. A very neat touch.) Michael
Westmore's makeup designs for the Queen, as well as the rest of the Borg,
are great--slick, creative, interesting to the eye, and very, well, Borg.
Noteworthy in the Data/Queen scenes are Data's emotional responses of fear
and subdued anger--appropriately utilized rather than released to run amok
like in "Generations." (This makes sense, since Data would have learned much
about controlling his feelings since that time.)
As the Enterprise copes with its problems, the script also supplies a
lighter story as Riker and Geordi attempt to convince Zefram Cochrane that
he's really a key figure in the future and that humanity is within a day of
being forever changed for the better. While the Borg-centered angle of the
story supplies issues of individuality and survival, this part of the story
is the true, Trekkian "heart" of the film. It deals with humanity and how it
views itself in the prospect of change. Riker's explanations to Cochrane
about how much the world will change after first contact is one of the many
highlights of the film. And, besides, the character interaction in this
story is just plain infectious. Cromwell, in particular, turns out to be an
amiable presence, with a lighthearted performance containing much grace and
humor--I liked Zefram Cochrane a lot. (I honestly don't remember the
Cochrane character that appeared in TOS, but I don't care, either.)
I could fully understand why Cochrane would be overwhelmed learning that
he's to be labeled a historic visionary. And I got a kick out of the whole
bit with the statue that Geordi explains, and the idea that the savior of
the future is merely a guy who wants to get drunk and make enough money to
retire to an island of naked women. (For that matter, I was amused at the
notion of Cochrane getting Deanna tipsy, agreeing to talk to her only after
"three shots of something called tequila.")
In a key passage, Cochrane explains to Riker that his motives were hardly
visionary--that he is not and does not want to be the "great man" that
everyone in the future knows him to be. Riker has a response:
Riker: "Someone once said, don't be a great man, just be a man, and let
history make its judgment."
Cochrane: That's rhetorical nonsense. Who said that?
Riker: "You did, ten years from now."
It's dialog like this that defines the Star Trek universe. It's reassuring
that at least some cinematic version of the future has imagination and hope
for humanity and still has the prudence not to always take itself so seriously.
As much that takes place in "First Contact" (and as haphazardly as I've
probably summarized it here), it's a credit to screenwriters Brannon Braga
and Ronald D. Moore that they manage to tie everything into an sensible,
efficient whole. They also manage to spread the material around all the main
TNG characters--much better than in "Generations." While obviously Picard,
Data, and the guest characters get much of the material, given the size of
the cast it's nice to see that everyone gets into the action one way or another.
And the plot's action provides some fresh and creative technical feats. The
most impressive set-piece is a neat zero gravity situation on the hull of
the ship, where Picard, Worf, and Lt. Hawk (Neal McDonough, who
unfortunately is provided little purpose in the film except to be the token
"dead meat" character) attempt to thwart the Borg's attempt to build a
beacon on the deflector dish. The special effects are convincing, to say the
least, and the entire episode is played out in a sort of slow-motion. In a
word, this is clever.
There's also the aforementioned Dixon Hill holodeck scene that Picard and
Sloane venture into to elude some Borg pursuers. The idea takes time out
from the standard chase to nearly transform into a movie with a life of its
own, complete with all the typical characters. (I particularly got a good
laugh out of the "Nicky the Nose" gag--one of the most subtly amusing
notions in the film.)
Naturally, there are the obligatory cameos--Robert Picardo as the EMH, Ethan
Phillips as a holodeck character, and Dwight Schultz recapping his character
Barclay at his most Barclayness--in the context of the film though, they
fit, particularly the moment when Barclay so enthusiastically meets
Cochrane, which underlines Cochrane's whole annoyance with being constantly
identified as a historical figure.
Nearing the end, the film brings the three plot lines together, with the
launch of Cochrane's warp rocket, the evacuation of the Enterprise (which
Picard finally comes to terms with losing and puts on a countdown to
auto-destruct), and the Queen's revelation to Picard that she has found an
"equal" to her in Data, who she is convinced is completely under her
control. She orders him to destroy Cochrane's warp ship with the
Enterprise's torpedoes. The most cheer-worthy moment of the movie, at least
for me, came when Data turned "Resistance is futile" around on the Queen,
much to her horror and disbelief. In one line, Data shows his ability to
keep his loyalty to humanity, surprising an arrogant creature and bringing
the entire Borg collective down with her. Nice job--it had me cheering.
After the Queen's demise, I still had some questions that left me a tad
perplexed, like, for instance, how exactly the Queen was on the Borg ship in
"Best of Both Worlds" that was destroyed. Seeing her again causes memories
to resurface in Picard--he remembers the Queen as the master behind his own
attempted assimilation. The Queen's retort that his feeble human mind is too
limited to understand was mysterious but unrevealing. Perhaps my primitive
three-dimensional mind isn't supposed to understand it, either. Too bad; I
would've appreciated understanding the Queen's history a little better. As a
symbol of oneness she works great, but the specifics are a tad overly vague.
As compensation, the film allows us to witness first contact between the
humans and the Vulcans. Without going too much into detail, I'll just say
that the sequence is a poignant, effective payoff, and a great way to end
the movie. I think it's the best scene in the entire film and one of the
better moments in Trek's history, with a genuine sense of wonder and
amazement and a real epic feel (and Jerry Goldsmith's theme is top-notch).
It lays down some of the background of the Federation, which I've always
wondered about, and it reveals that Star Trek cares not just where it's
going, but also where it came from. As a Trekker so close to the series, I
was moved. (Don't begin to ask me how a non-Trekker would react, though--I
wouldn't know.)
"First Contact" is not really the action-packed "Borg movie" the trailers
want to suggest. It's got action and adventure, sure. But it's really about
assembling a sci-fi plot to entertain in thoughtful ways, using the
resources and history of the seemingly-immortal concept of Trek itself. If
this film is an indication of where the franchise intends to go, I'll gladly
be aboard for the next ride.
--------------------
This review Copyright (c) 1996 by Jamahl Epsicokhan, all rights reserved by
the author, including the right to reproduce with the intent of unauthorized
distribution, electronic or otherwise. This review is an original work of
fair criticism and remains the property of the author.
Star Trek: Hypertext --
  http://www.students.uiuc.edu/~epsicokh/trek/
Jamahl Epsicokhan -- epsicokh@uiuc.edu

Author
ih84rds@aol.com
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Since ST:First Contact premiered over a week ago, I've had several people
write and ask what I thought of the film.  I didn't get to see the movie
opening weekend because I had both a sick baby and an ill wife, but we
finally got to go Friday night.  So here goes.
The Plot
The first thing I heard about STFC was the plot and to say the least, I was
uderwhelmed.  It sounded like fan fiction based upon the brief version I
initially heard and it sounded too much like Terminator for my liking.
Over all, the film was faithful to that version, but Braga and Moore's
script had enough twists and turns to overcome any geeky elements the
original concept might have contained.
The Script
With one exception (Data's "to hell with order's" speech), it was as tight
and as polished as any of the Trek films.  There were a couple of
Treknobabble inconsistancies (see the NitPicks section), but I was
impressed.
Direction
In a nutshell, Paramount is crazy if they let anyone but Frakes direct the
next film.  It's obvious he loves Trek, respects the fans and on top of
everything else, he's talented as a director.  If Hollywood does not offer
this man other projects in the future, it will be their and our loss.
Acting/Characters
I had grown to hate Picard.  After the political correctness of TNG's last
two seasons, I lost all respect for him.  After he had a chance to kill the
entire Borg collective and passed it by, he allowed an entire planet to die
in the name of the Prime Directive and eventually got Jim Kirk killed (okay
this is a reach, but I was POed at him to begin with), I was thoroughly
disgusted with both Stewart and Picard.  I prayed that this movie would
begin with Admiral Picard tossing Will Riker the keys the Enterprise-E, but
STFC has changed my opinion.  I will not call him "an action hero", but I
do see him as a very complex man of deep convictions and feelings.  If you
take TNG and the two movies as a whole, the arc of Picard's development has
reached a point where he is free of his demons and will be able become the
captain that I've wanted to see since Encounter at Farpoint.  Stewart is an
incredible actor and I hope he stays involved with Trek.
The rest of the characters felt more like real people than they did on TNG.
 I regret that we didn't see more of Sirtis and McFadden, but I loved
seeing Barkely.  LaForge has grown, but I wish we could have seen more than
the engineering side of him.  The only thing I had to keep asking myself is
why the heck hasn't Riker taken command of a ship yet?
When I heard that Cromwell was cast as Cochrane I worried that I would keep
expecting him to say, "That'll do, pig." but he was great.  No, he looked
nothing like the guy who played Cochrane in TOS, but it didn't bother me.
BTW, Steppenwolf was a perfect choice for the first warp test.
Technical
The technical merit of this film is way beyond Generations.  The previous
movie looked more like a wide screen TV episode, but this one looked and
felt like a movie.  The effects were awesome though I'm still not sure what
I think of Enterprise-E.  I like it much better that Enterprise-D, but
that's not saying much.
Summation
Except, for the nitpicks listed below, I loved this movie.  No, it wasn't
Babylon5, Star Wars, Aliens or Terminator, but it was the one thing it set
out to be: STAR TREK.  Regardless of what you think of Rodenberry's vision
of the future, this film was faithful to it while at the same time being
one heck of a ride.  I think Gene would have been pleased.
Is this the best Trek film?  I don't really know, but it does rank with
Kahn and Undiscovered Country.
Nitpick#1
There's no way a tourniquet would have kept Worf's space suit from
completely bleeding off into space.
Nitpick#2
Plasma is a highly energized state of matter in which the electrons have
been stripped from the atomic nuclei and exist as a high temperature,
randomly charged soup.  The surface of the sun consists of plasma.  If warp
plasma had spilled into Engineering it would have either risen as a hot gas
would do or it would have uniformly dispersed through the compartment.
Either way, Picard would have been toast.
Nitpick#3
It was too darned easy for Geordi to configure to the nacelles to emit
chronoton particles and send the ship back to the 24 th century.  Why not
call it the Timeship Enterprise if it was that easy?  Granted, the story
was over, but at least give us the sling shot effect and a final shot of
the Enterprise blasting away from the sun back to the 24 th century.

Author
Phil Curtolo
The crew of the Enterprise is back to do battle with their most lethal
enemies, the Borg, in Star Trek: First Contact.
The film stars the cast from the Star Trek: The Next Generation
television show. Captain Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart), Commander
William Riker (Jonathan Franks), Lieutenant-Commander Data (Brent
Spiner), Lieutenant-Commander Geordi LaForge (LeVar Burton) and
Lieutenant-Commander Worf (Michael Dorn) should all be familiar names to
Trekies, which is the name given to fans. Some new faces are seen in the
film, including James Cromwell, Alfre Woodard and Alice Krige.
This 8th episode in the long-lived series rotates around an event
called "First Contact."  Zefrum Cochrane (Cromwell, Babe) and his
partner Lily Sloane (Woodard, Primal Fear) are to make the first warp
speed launch in the history of the planet. Aliens are to pick this up
and eventually land, peacefully, on Earth. This is a turning point in
history, where the world stops fighting each other and starts fighting
inter-galactic enemies. The Borg, lead by the evil Borg Queen (Krige,
Sleepwalkers), travel back in time to stop this event from happening,
and the Enterprise follows.
In past films, the battles were fought between the Enterprise and the
Borg ship. Well not this time, as the Borg army of half-human robots get
onto the Enterprise, in attempt to take it over. One by one, the crew
members are turned into Borgs.
The usual acting performances were delivered by the usual stars, but
Cromwell's Zefrum Cochrane, a drunken professor living in the past,
which is our future, who is to change the course of history. Needless to
say, his character is quite memorable, as he tries numerous times to run
away.
To my surprise, Jonathan Franks not only starred in the film, but also
directed it. He did a fine job, as the finished product turned out
wonderfully.
Excellent special effects, gripping music, and clever turns are just a
few of the surprises in Star Trek: First Contact.
Grade: B+, **** out of *****

Author
Philip Richard Yabut
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Release date:  November 22, 1996
Author's viewing date:  December 7, 1996
The (very) long-awaited sequel to TNG "The Best of Both Worlds" has
arrived, mixing the Borg, time travel, a little history, some humor, a new
soundtrack, and eye-popping special effects.  It has proven to be a winner
in the eyes of the critics and box office receipts.
FC wasn't just about the Borg and time travel and rearranging history.
This was also the continuation of the journey that Captain Picard has
taken as he continues to recover from his assimilation to the Collective
six years prior.  Here we see something that looks totally out of
character for Picard: the thirst for revenge.  But one has to remember
that Picard was violated beyond imagination, stripped of his humanity and
forced to murder thousands of his own people.  Ironically it is Lily, a
woman he had just met who had never even heard of the Borg, who reminds
Picard of his duty to humanity...and himself.  The Captain Ahab references
work beautifully to illustrate the self-defeating aspects of Picards
personal vendetta.
The movie featured appearances, some uncredited, by other ST actors, like
Robert Picardo as the Enterprise's EMH and Dwight Schultz as Lieutenant
Barclay. But did you notice that Ethan Phillips was the first guy to get
thrown around by the Borg in Picard's holodeck program?  He acted a little
like Neelix, too.
Speaking of other ST actors, there were a couple of recycled guys, too.
James Cromwell, last seen on ST as the Karemma representative Hanok in DS9
"Starship Down," is the most obvious.  But did you know that Jack Shearer
(Admiral Hayes) was last seen in VOY "Non Sequitur" and DS9 "Destiny?"
Data's quest to be more human took a bizarre turn when the Borg Queen
kidnaps him and starts giving him some skin.  This is the opposite of what
the Borg usually do to other races.  And it looks like Data as finally
mastered the art of the bluff, as he fooled the Queen and Picard (and
probably the unspoiled viewer) into believing he was loyal to the Borg
(assimilated, as it were).
* A few words on those weird opening credits
It looks like the TNG movies are going to use the same font for the
credits, first seen in "Generations" (if anyone can identify the name of
that font, please tell me).  The credits themselves looked like they were
introducing a second-rate B-movie, and they made me dizzy.
There were plenty of 47s in the film, including Picard's access code...The
entire final scene with the settlement, the trees, and the musical score
was reminiscent of ST5's close.  Thankfully, you couldn't hear Kirk, Spock
and McCoy singing "Row, Row, Row Your Boat"...I guess the Borg don't have
to breathe.  Assimilated Earth didn't have oxygen in its atmosphere; and
they seemed to survive just fine outdoors while Picard and Co.  donned
spacesuits...That music Picard was listening to at glass-shattering volume
sounded a lot like Klingon opera...2063 happens to be 2 years after the
next flyby of Halley's Comet.  It's also 98 years before the founding of
the Federation and exactly 300 years before the Enterprise-D was
commissioned...That part of Montana looked pretty good considering the
world was just ten years removed from World War III...Past episode
references:  TNG "The Best of Both Worlds" [I & II], "The Naked Now,"
"Generations"...The "Borg Queen" was never referred to as the "Borg Queen"
by anyone, although that's what the credits call her...Riker described the
Defiant as a "tough little ship." Tom Riker used the same words to
describe Captain Sisko's warship in DS9 "Defiant"...Was it just me, or did
Marina Sirtis use her real hair in the film (as opposed to a wig)?...The
Enterprise-E's bridge was reminiscent of Voyager's.  And Engineering bore
a resemblence to its counterpart on the Defiant.  Could they be redressed
sets?...The Typhon sector, the area where Starfleet made its last stand,
was also the setting for that temporal causality loop in TNG "Cause and
Effect."  Interestingly, the USS Bozeman also figured in both of these
stories.
Best f/x --
- Third prize:  That first majestic shot of Hawk, Worf and Picard walking
  *on* the ship.
- Second prize:  The battle against the Borg in the Typhon sector.
  Definitely first-class.
- First prize:  The souped-up Borg are an f/x marvel by themselves.  But
  the spectacular opening shot of Picard/Locutus on the Borg ship is one
  to remember.
Best lines --
- Third prize:  "You broke your ships."  -Lily
- Second prize:  "Assimilate *this*."  -Worf
- First prize:  "The Borg?  Sounds Swedish."  -Lily
Best moments --
- Third prize:  Deanna gets drunk with the legendary Zephram Cochrane.
- Second prize:  Cochrane meets the Vulcans--and can't do the salute.
- First prize:  Picard and Lily square off in the Observation Lounge.

Author
Cameron Shelley
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Star Trek: First Contact (Paramount)
Whereas the previous film, Star Trek: Generations, was
very like a mediocre TV episode, Star Trek: First Contact
(ST:FC) was more like a competant episode from the
Next Generation TV series. Most likely we have director
Jonathan Frakes to thank for that. Frakes certainly seems
to be in his element here, and deserves credit for making
this movie an enjoyable spectacle. Visually, this film
works well, matching the feeling of entrapment and
restriction with the darkness of the Borg-controlled areas
of the ship, the ceiling-height shots of armed patrols
passing through the corridors, and the feeling that being
in orbit is like just starting to fall a very tall cliff.
Although the premise of the film is not especially
promising (more on that below), it is really a film for the
director and actors to lose, and they don't. Being in the
director's chair relieves Frakes from having to "act," so
that Cmdr. Riker can just sit in the background and
smirk at events in the foreground, such as Troi getting
drunk or Cochrane turning up the tunes in his
spaceship. The lead actors, namely Stewart, Spiner,
Woodard, Cromwell, and Krige all perform well to
admirably, although Stewart is the only one allowed to
show any depth of character (but not too much). The
effect is enjoyable and without surprises.
Where ST:FC tends to fall down is the writing. The plot
itself is mildly irritating where it is allowed to intrude
on the events on screen. The difficulty starts with the
tried-and-thoroughly-boring device of time travel.
Remember Roddenberry's injunction, at the start of the
ST:TNG TV series, that the Enterprise wouldn't be
allowed to exceed warp 10 because it had become such an
overused ploy to create tension and plot movement? A
similar moratorium should be placed on time travel (or
at least time machines) right away! Five minutes into
the film, I found myself asking why it was that the Borg
had to fly to Earth, and into the teeth of a Federation
fleet, to travel back in time when they could have done
it far away from Earth with complete impunity?
In fact, the easy recourse to time travel exposes a
fundamental problem with the character of this film.
Besides being a crutch for weak plots (as in ST:Gs), time
travel allows ST to scratch its metaphorical itch for
self-examination. Part of the reason Star Trekkers travel
back in time so much is for the cheap thrill of witnessing
history. Having achieved perfection (as we are repeatedly
assured by the characters on screen), the only place to go
for excitement in the 24th century is the 20th century (or
the 21st, in a pinch). Time travel is the ultimate form of
tourism, borrowing adventure and novelty from events
for which the outcome is safely assured. The problem
with this habit of borrowing is that it makes "genuine"
novelty superficial.
Looking around the scenery, we can see the kind of thing
Picard apparently means when he says that the challenge
in the future is to "improve oneself." Dr. Crusher is now
a blonde, the new Enterprise looks different from the
previous ones, Jordi has some even funkier eyeware
than before, Picard can hear the Borg singing, Data can
turn his emotion chip off, and the Starfleet uniforms are
a little different. Some borrowing is justified, eg, the
"Alien"-like look of the Borg collective, the spacewalk
on the bottom of the saucer section (compare with the
spacewalk in ST:TMP), and maybe even the cameos from
the Voyager TV crew, but the combined effect is too
much. The narrow focus on history and cosmetic change
make ST:FC seem like an ongoing "trvia challenge"
sometimes.
The writers are certainly aware of this problem.
Cochrane (who is known from the original ST series as
the inventor of warp drive) is worshipped in the 24th
century as an icon of virtue but is portrayed as a drunk, a
lout, and a would-be Casanova. Some humor is made by
contrasting his real personality with the myth that has
evolved afterwards. But Cochrane is safely domesticated
by the end of the film. Inadvertant self-parody is
achieved when the mysterious "aliens" prophesied by
the Enterprise crew turn out to be---the Vulcans! Was
there every any doubt? The film leaves us with the cozy
image of something both the characters and audience
already knew would happen.
In a nutshell, ST:FC is a mixed bag. The acting and
direction show that there's life in the old girl yet. The
story, however, is a failure by the same consideration.
Roddenberry used to say that ST was about issues: sex,
war, justice, and so on. Now ST is about ST, and ST:FC is
an enjoyable and largely empty experience.
cpshelle@watarts.uwaterloo.ca - Phone: (519) 888-1211 x2555
        Me: http://watarts.uwaterloo.ca/~cpshelle>

Author
Richard F. Drushel
        The question for me in writing this review is, should I review it
as a typical mid-1990s movie, or as a "Star Trek" movie.  For me, depending
upon which of those criteria I use, ST:FC comes out as either an excellent
movie or a disturbing movie.
        ST:FC is an action-packed, techno-blockbuster.  That's the kind of
movie that's selling nowadays, that's the movie that Paramount wanted
Jonathan Frakes to make, and that's just what he delivered.  Shoot-'em-up,
blast-'em-up, eye-popping effects, cool ships, awesome space battles,
a hint of kinky (i.e., Borg) sex.  Of all the movies, this is the one
that's most accessible to the non-Trekker audience--and that's surely the
intended target.
        Concessions were made to the Trekker audience:  Zefrem Cochrane
as inventor of the warp drive; the cameo appearances by Barclay and
the holographic Doctor and Dixon Hill's Girl Friday (as well as actor
Ethan Phillips as a maitre-d'); Worf bringing the Defiant from DS9;
the return of the model Enterprises in the Ready Room; the reuse of
the Klingon theme from ST:TMP, as well as the ST:TOS and ST:TMP/TNG
main title themes; the basically hopeful (i.e., Roddenberry) view of
humanity post-first contact.  [They seem to have forgotten, however,
that Cochrane was "Zefram Cochrane of Alpha Centauri" in ST:TOS
"Metamorphosis", and that the original date for the discovery of
the warp drive was 2018.]
        *  That whole hull sequence.  It was too convenient that those
        access controls were so...accessible.  And in zero gravity, to
        have those isolinear memory crystals just sitting in slots,
        covered only by a thin-looking protective panel...that's pretty
        bad design for something on the exterior hull of a spaceship.
        Sigh.  I guess my chief dissatisfaction with ST:FC is that I can
see all the strings of the puppet.  Here's the hooks for the Trekkers,
here's for the ID4 crowd, here's for the Aliens crowd, etc.  That is, it
was too calculated and targeted.  I never got the feeling that, here's an
important story to be told, and the ST universe is the place to tell it.
Rather, it was all too plain to me that ST is a franchise, and that making
lots of $$$ is the reason it was made.  And more sadly, there are more
$$$ to be had from people who have not been traditional Trekkers, so the
movie is more targeted to *them* rather than the traditional audience.
        I was 4 years old when ST:TOS debuted.  I can remember
flipping past it on the TV a few times during what had to be its
final season.  I remember that I didn't like it; I liked "Land of
the Giants" instead :-)  I didn't really like ST until it was syndicated
in the early 1970s.  As an early teenager with Spockish tendencies,
I felt that ST:TOS was somehow talking directly to *me*.  I got
the same feelings from the first 6 seasons of ST:TNG and the first
2 seasons of ST:DS9.  Most net.people berate ST:TNG first season
episodes, but I can remember how glad I was to see that they were
explicitly worrying about implications of the Prime Directive (e.g.,
"Angel One", "Justice") or of the Captain-In-Danger plot trap.
It felt good, for once, to be part of an audience that somebody
cared about.
        The recent ST offerings don't talk to me.  They don't
*try* to talk to me.  I'm not of interest to the people doing the
talking.  ST:DS9 in season 3 abandoned its Bajor-Cardassia story
arc and has been mostly pointless "action" stuff with Klingons
and The Dominion.  ST:VOY is willing to do *anything* to try to
reach UPN's desirable young-males marketing segment, so we get
grade Z sci-fi monsters, Baywatch-In-Space holobabes, a Captain
who's a nurturing mommy one week and a kick-butt Hero(tm) the
next.  And for me, the last straw is ST:FC, which screams at me,
"Your past support is irrelevant.  Other audiences are more
profitable.  You are irrelevant."
        ST is now a Franchise(tm).  "The security of the Enterprise
(tm) is of Paramount importance."  To protect its bottom line in the
most Ferengi way possible, the Franchise(tm) is shutting down fan
websites and BBSes, all of which detract from the One True Official
Site(tm), which can only be viewed by paying members of the Microsoft
Network(tm).
        ST:FC is a "good movie" (it will make lots of $$$ at the
boxoffice), and its profits will keep the Franchise(tm) going
strong.  But for me, it's not "Star Trek" any more, even though
it bears the official, authorized trademark.  Jonathan Frakes is
an excellent director, and I wish him every success in his future
endeavors behind the camera, be they ST or otherwise.
        But for me, ST:FC is not "Star Trek".  In fact, I think that
"Star Trek" is *dead*.  Its living descendant, however, appears to be
J. Michael Strazynski's "Babylon Five".  B5 makes me feel the way
that ST:TOS/TNG/early DS9 made me feel.  Hopefully B5 will manage to
be successful without becoming a Franchise(tm) and thus, ceasing to
be what it is now, one of the best shows on TV ever anywhere.

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
CAPSULE: The Even-Off Rule holds up once again; this is easily the best
"Trek" yet. Do not wait for video.
Ask any Star Trek devotee about the Even-Odd Rule of Trek Movies, and
you're likely to get one of the oddest bits of movie folklore this side of
the man who allegedly hanged himself on the set of "The Wizard of Oz".
The Even-Odd rule is simple: all of the odd-numbered Star Trek movies
stink, and the even-numbered ones are wicked cool. Think for a minute:
since when has anyone actually admitted to liking Star Trek: The Motionless
Picture? Or Trek 3, the Search for Cash? Trek 5 (about which the less said,
the better)? And wasn't the first Next Generation Trek movie a bit of a
letdown?
The reverse also seems to hold true: Treks II, IV and VI all hold up well
on repeat viewings -- not just as Trek movies, but as movies, period. My
personal votes go for Trek II -- and now Trek VIII, or "First Contact", as
the wags at Paramount have chosen to dub it.
If you didn't follow "Star Trek: The Next Generation" when it was on TV,
you may miss a few things, but the opening five minutes cover that
territory without too much trouble. That, and we get *easily* one of the
most amazing opening shots I've ever seen: basically, a pull-back shot that
starts at the near-microscopic level and ends up giving us a view of
something about the size of a small planet. It's something else.
The story settles into place quickly. The Borg, a monolithic race who fused
technology and biology milennia ago, are even more hellbent on assimilating
the Federation's space than ever. Not good. To that end, they've employed a
dastardly plot that ultimately involves time travel -- to say more would
spoil the fun -- and the crew of the Enterprise decide to defy orders and
follow them.
The movie quickly bifurcates into the familiar away team / up-on-the-ship
plot threads, although each one of them develop in totally different
directions. The ship becomes the center of a swarming Borg invasion
(something like "Die Hard" in space), and the away team find themselves
having to adapt to rather primitive surroundings (oh, and there's this
little problem with the locals...) I'm being deliberately vague to avoid
ruining a good many surprises -- not the least of which involves Data's
newly-installed emotion chip (you remember that, right?) and the Borg
queen. The less said about her, definitely the better.
(This movie may also settle some bets among Trek enthusiasts: "So what
would happen in a Borg and Data got into an arm-wrestling match?" Or a Borg
and Worf, for that matter? Watch and learn...)
The cast is in fine form. Memorable scenes include Deanna Troi (Marina
Sirtis) getting royally drunk on *real* alcohol for a change, and Data's
increasingly tense exvhanges with the Borg queen. The supporting actors are
also good. Alfre Woodard is especially well-used (her funniest line about
the Borg: "Sounds like they're Swedish..."), and she and Patrick Stewart
have one amazingly well-written and -played scene together near the end.
Jonathan Frakes, the actor who portrays William Riker in the series, was
given the helm this time. According to the press notes, he studied films
like "Blade Runner", "2001" and the earlier "Star Trek" films for notes an
inspiration. The homework paid off: this is easily the best of the "Trek"
movies, and a standalone triumph, too.

Author
Mike V
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
     It pains me to see so many people ogling over this rather mediocre
picture.  I intend this review to be short and to the point, so I will not
discuss the plot except where it is relevant to my opinions.  If you are
looking for a brief synopsis, check out any of the other reviews on this
newsgroup.  
     The film begins in tragic fashion with yet another time travel
paradox.  This is generally what writers come up with when they cannot
think of a decent science fiction plot.  We are all familiar with the
paradoxes associated with such a move, and we also know that the matter
has never been satisfactorily dealt with.  Not only does Stak Trek fail
where all others have failed, it doesn't even address the paradox -- as if
there is no paradox to be addressed.  
     Things go from bad to worse when the Borg magically appear on the
Enterprise, now back in the 21st century (it appeared that the Borg probe
was destroyed, so where did they beam on from?).  Now, the borg are
certainly a fascinating species as portrayed on the show (Next
Generation).  It also appeared as if they had already been dealt with.
But here they are ressurected with a terminator style vengeance.  They are
hellbent on assimilating everything that moves.  
     It is precisely for this reason that I find the movie so
displeasing.   It is a horrible disservice to sci-fi fans to turn an
interesting sci-fi plot into an action movie.  This, however, is done time
and time again (Jurassic Park, Independence Day, the last Star Trek, and
so forth).  At this point in the film it became abundantly clear that I
could put my brain on hold and just watch the action as I might watch
Die-Hard.  
     the only thing that salvages the film is the interesting relationship
that develops between Picard, his crew, and the earthlings.  Still, I
found a thoroughly vindictive Picard somewhat implausible.  I very much
doubt that this character would sacrifice the fate of humanity to exact
revenge upon the Borg.  
     Furthermore, haven't we had enough of Data trying to be human?  He
has the emotion chip already -- is there really a further need for some
kind of erotic stimulation from a cyborg?  Data's quest to become more
human has also been dealt with on many occasions (and far more coherently)
on the show (a great episode was the one in which he became "father" to a
new android).  
    Finally, the notion that a burned out rocker creates the very first
warp drive shuttle is just absurd.  His character was utterly implausible,
and it wasn't because of the acting.  Are we to believe that the greatest
scientific discovery, one that bridges the gaps of space, was stumbled
upon by an embittered drunk looking for an isle of nymphs?  
     In conclusion, let me first apologize for the poor structure of this
review.  It was written off the kuff, without any forethought plan of
attack.  In any event, every sci-fi notion in the film was dealt with much
better in the show.  This movie has nothing new or interesting to offer,
and it ultimately degenerates into another hollywood action film.  

Author
Michael Dequina
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Star Trek: First Contact (PG-13) *** (out of ****)
        Anyone familiar with the series of Star Trek movies knows of the
"even-odd pattern"--the even-numbered installments of the series are good
while the odd-numbered ones are, well, not-so-good.  The pattern continues
with the new Star Trek: First Contact, an energetic sci-fi adventure that
(coincidentally?) is the eighth entry in the hugely popular series.
        In this first Trek feature to feature only cast members from the
late Star Trek: The Next Generation television series, Captain Jean-Luc
Picard (Patrick Stewart) and the rest of the 24th-century crew of the
Starship Enterprise--Commander Will Riker (Jonathan Frakes, who also
directed), android Lt. Cmdr. Data (Brent Spiner), Lt. Cmdr. Geordi LaForge
(LeVar Burton), Lt. Cmdr. Worf (Michael Dorn), Dr. Beverly Crusher (Gates
McFadden), and Counselor Deanna Troi (Marina Sirtis)--travel back to
21st-century earth while doing battle with the Borg, a race of cybernetic
beings that share a collective mind with the Borg Queen (Alice Krige).  The
Borg intend to alter history and assimilate all of humankind into their
race--starting with the earth-orbiting crew of the Enterprise and a 21st
century stowaway (Alfre Woodard).
        This is an interesting plotline that is sure to mesmerize Trekkers
everywhere and engage everyone else, but, unfortunately, it only makes up
the Star Trek half of the script by Brannon Braga and Ronald D. Moore.  The
other half of the title--First Contact--refers to a subplot that takes place
on 21st-century earth, where Riker, Troi, and LaForge meet legendary
scientist Zephram Cochran (James Cromwell), who is about to embark on the
first warp speed flight in human history, which directly leads to the first
contact with extraterrestrials.  While this story does tie into the main
plot and pays off interestingly in the end, it is nowhere near as involving
or exciting as the Borg battles on the Enterprise.  Not helping matters is
the tiresome Cochran character, an eccentric whose drunken schtick starts
out funny but becomes too one-note after a while.
        In the end, though, the First Contact subplot doesn't detract from
the enjoyment of the film as a whole.  The story is typical sci-fi fantasy,
but the conviction of the cast--most notably the always-phenomenal
Stewart--makes you believe and care.  Frakes, making his feature directorial
debut, keeps the action swiftly rolling along and delivers the action goods,
even upping the violence a notch (this is the first Trek film to bear a
PG-13 rating) to greater effect.  ST:FC has a bigger budget than the last
Trek outing, the middling Star Trek Generations, and it definitely shows on
screen--the production design and especially visual and makeup effects are
outstanding (in particular those involving the Borg Queen).  Braga and
Moore's mostly sharp script will please both Trek devotees and the rest; the
references to the Borg storyline in the TV series, the continuity with the
previous film (e.g. the ongoing saga of Data's emotion chip), and a fleeting
Star Trek: Voyager crossover will make Trekkers squeal with delight, but
such points are made easily accessible to those less familiar to the Trek
mythos.
        Paramount was reportedly worried about the staying power of its Trek
franchise with the Next Generation cast now carrying the helm.  Based on the
entertaining success that is Star Trek: First Contact, I'd say the studio
has nothing to worry about (at least not until this cast retires and the
crew of the wan Star Trek: Deep Space Nine takes over...).
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  /  mrbrown@michaeljordanfan.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html

Author
James Berardinelli
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
United States, 1996
U.S. Release Date: 11/22/96 (wide)
Running Length: 1:51
MPAA Classification: PG-13 (Violence, profanity, sexual innuendo)
Theatrical Aspect Ratio: 2.35:1
Cast: Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton, 
      Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, Alfre Woodard, 
      James Cromwell, Alice Krige, Neal McDonough 
Director: Jonathan Frakes
Producer: Rick Berman
Screenplay: Rick Berman, Brannon Braga, and Ronald D. Moore
Cinematography: Matthew F. Leonetti
Music: Jerry Goldsmith
U.S. Distributor: Paramount Pictures
     For the first time in the seventeen-year run of the successful STAR 
TREK movie franchise, there is no Captain Kirk.  STAR TREK: FIRST 
CONTACT, the eighth entry into the motion picture series, is the first 
to rely exclusively on the crew of THE NEXT GENERATION, who were 
introduced to film audiences two years ago in STAR TREK: GENERATIONS.  
Following in the wake of a trio of disappointing features, FIRST CONTACT 
proves to be the most entertaining STAR TREK in more than a decade.  
First time director Jonathan Frakes (who also plays Riker, the 
Enterprise's second-in-command) injects some badly-needed energy and 
inventiveness into a series that, prior to this effort, was sinking 
under its own weight and boldly going nowhere.
     A conscious decision was made to develop FIRST CONTACT into the 
most action-oriented adventure since STAR TREK II: THE WRATH OF KHAN, 
and the largely-effective results speak for themselves.  This film 
moves, rarely ever stopping to take a breath.  Originality is not at an 
all-time high, but the film makers have shown a great deal of ingenuity 
in grafting elements of MOBY DICK, ALIENS, TERMINATOR 2, CLOSE 
ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND, RETURN OF THE JEDI, and even DIE HARD onto 
the familiar STAR TREK formula, which emphasizes ideas over mindless 
thrills.  The editing is crisp and the direction is sure-handed, making 
for perhaps the most streamlined STAR TREK movie of them all.
     The highlight of FIRST CONTACT is the first reel, a recklessly-
paced, dazzling display of special effects that is exhausting in its 
intensity.  For the first time in eight films, there's no "getting to 
know you" period.  Five minutes after the opening credits have ended, 
we're right in the middle of the action.  And what action it is -- the 
most spectacular space battle ever to grace the screen in a STAR TREK 
film.  It's clear that this sequence, with dozens of starships doing 
battle with the enemy -- a cube-like Borg vessel -- ate up a 
considerable portion of the budget.
     The Borg, undoubtedly THE NEXT GENERATION's most popular foe, 
appeared in about a half-dozen TV episodes, but created a legacy that 
made them a natural choice for a big screen appearance.  Half-organic, 
half-robot, the Borg all share one mind, and have proven to be the most 
difficult foe for the Federation to overcome.  In FIRST CONTACT, when an 
attack of Earth during the 24th century fails, the Borg travel back in 
time to change history.  The USS Enterprise-E, helmed by Captain Jean-
Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart), must follow them to the mid-21st century 
to save the future.  But the Borg are on board the Enterprise, and a 
battle for control of the ship soon develops.
     As a species, the Borg are effective, cinematic villains, although, 
on an individual level, their "queen" (played by Alice Krige) is 
probably the least menacing of them all.  The Borg's natural 
implacability enhances their sinister aura.  There's something eerie 
about creatures that kill matter-of-factly and don't make a sound when 
they're injured.  The Borg's hive -- actually the corridors of the 
Enterprise's lower decks -- bears more than a passing resemblance to the 
nest of the Alien queen in James Cameron's ALIENS.
     FIRST CONTACT's greatest asset is Patrick Stewart.  The British 
screen veteran's presence is formidable enough to allow us to forget 
William Shatner.  Stewart makes us believe in and care about the 
proceedings.  Here, Picard is not just the "intellectual commander" his 
reputation suggests.  Instead, he has become a futuristic Ahab, intent 
on revenge (he was once captured and "assimilated" into the "Borg 
collective").  Stewart gives vitality and power to Picard's obsessive 
rage.
     All the regulars from the NEXT GENERATION crew are on hand:  First 
Officer Will Riker (Frakes), Data (Brent Spiner) the android, Chief 
Engineer Geordi LaForge (LeVar Burton), Worf (Michael Dorn) the Klingon, 
Doctor Beverly Crusher (Gates McFadden), and Counselor Deanna Troi 
(Marina Sirtis).  Plus, for fans of the series, there are a couple of 
unexpected cameos.  Joining the regular crew for this one-time outing 
are James Cromwell (BABE) as Zefram Cochrane, the creator of warp drive, 
and Alfre Woodard (PASSION FISH) as Lily Sloane, his no-nonsense 
assistant.
     If there's an obvious area where FIRST CONTACT falls short, it's in 
its stabs at humor.  Many of these seem like forced attempts to 
reduplicate the lightness of STAR TREK IV (the one with the humpback 
whales), and only a few don't come across as misplaced.  There are 
occasional instances of natural comedy, but Troi getting drunk rings 
about as true as Scotty cracking his skull on a bulkhead in STAR TREK V.
     The script is cleverly written so that non-fans will be able to 
follow and enjoy the plot while aficionados will get all the little "in" 
references.  FIRST CONTACT effortlessly negotiates a number of potential 
problem areas (such as time travel), which is a credit to the 
screenwriting team of Brannon Braga, Ronald Moore, and producer Rick 
Berman.
     After three consecutive less-than-stellar adventures, FIRST CONTACT 
has single-handedly revived the STAR TREK movie series, at least from a 
creative point-of-view.  If the box office results follow suit, there 
will be a STAR TREK 9, hopefully with Patrick Stewart and his crew on 
board.  Whatever the case, there's little doubt that FIRST CONTACT has 
come along at the right time to ensure that STAR TREK continues to live 
long and prosper.
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 

Author
Steve Kong
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Director:  Jonathan Frakes
Screenwriters: Ronald D. Moore and Brannon Braga
Starring:  Patrick Steward, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,       
Prepared to be assimilated?  Yes!  Knowing the old saying that all even 
numbered Star Trek movies are good, and all odd numbered movies are either 
mediocre or bad, I came into First Contact ready to see a good movie.  Did I 
come out with a feeling that I saw a good movie?  Yes.
For Star Trek movies there is one problem that follows them.  You have to 
cater to two distinctly different audiences in order to make a large profit.  
The first audience is the die-hard Star Trek fans.  The second is the more 
general audience, who either knows little or nothing about Star Trek.  First 
Contact swings a lot towards the first audience.  It is built around Captain 
Picards original encounter with the Borg.
The encounter gets a small flashback in the beginning of the film, and that is 
all that is really said about the encounter to help the general audience 
along.  For those of us who are well versed in what happened between Picard 
and the Borg, we are drawn into the story and understand what is driving 
Picard to do what he is doing.  For the rest of the general audience, they are 
left to catch up.  And the director, Jonathan Frakes (also playing Riker), 
gives little time to catch up.  From the explosive starship battle with the 
Borg cube beginning to the explosive ending, Frakes keeps the pace of the 
movie quick.
The story is about the Borg heading for Earth, readying to assimilate the 
human race.  The new Enterprise E, with Picard at the helm is sent elsewhere 
by the Admiral.  The Admiral believes that Picard is too emotionally involved 
with the Borg to be in this battle.  Picard, obviously disregards the orders 
and goes into battle.  The Borg in a last ditch effort goes back in time to 
try to assimilate the human race back then.  And that is where the real meat 
of the story goes.
If you are a Trekker or are familiar with the Next Generation crew, you will 
love this film.  If you are new to the Star Trek franchise, you might want to 
just review what happened between Picard and the Borg before going off to see 
this film. There is a great mix of humor and action in this film.  And the 
pacing of the film will keep you at the edge of your seats in many tense 
situations.
But, in any case, resistance is futile.  So go see this film!


Author
Jonathan P. Crone
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Star Trek First Contact is a romp through the Star
Trek mythos that simultaneously shows the strengths of
'Trek' and the maddening weaknesses of Trek.
The Strong:    Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, and Brent Spiner
Spiner pulls off a top notch job as Data gets teased by the Borg
Queen with his ultimate desire. Right up to the climatic moment,
you don't see the 'wham' coming.
Frakes just set himself up with a lucrative career as a
film director. Good pacing, a strong style with the scenes
inside the enterprise, a understanding of what is good about
a Trek movie. As an actor we didn't have too much
of the 'I'm Kirk's replacement' or the smugness that
was regularly made fun of in 'Q' episodes. Its almost as if
the Second in Command = good director rule needs definition.
Nimoy, Frakes... not bad company.
Stewart's performances in individual scenes were stronger than
the best that we saw from Shatner in complete movies. Patrick
Stewart is the best part of First Contact. The portrayal
drifting from the frustrated, to the man of action, to obsession,
to resolution is delivered in a quality, appealling manner.
Unfortunately, everyone else is window dressing. Sirtis and Mcfadden
get almost a prefunctory obligitory scene each. (But Sirtis made
the most of it, with a hilarious scene with the Zephram Cochrane
character)
Getting Michael Dorn onto the Enterprise was handled extremely well, but
once he was onboard, Worf almost faded into the scenery. Too bad.
LeVar Burton had some good scenes with James Cromwell (Zephram Cochrane)
but didn't get a chance to truly shine.
The guest stars were well chosen.
The actress who played the Borg Queen had a perfect degree of menace,
and in one scene (you'll know it when you see it) with Spiner/Data
you could just feel the audience going 'whoa'
Alfre Woodward had to be cast for her one key scene where she faces
down Stewart/Picard. The rest of the movie, she gets in the way,
but in one key moment she plays off the 'picard' mythos very well.
James Cromwell as Zephram Cochrane had a tough job. He has to play
off everyone treating him as a hero, even if he doesn't believe
he is one.
Well done. He ably plays the drunk who suddenly has to put up
with hero worship.
The special effects are well executed, especially in the initial key
combat sequences.
The distressing habit that Trek unveiled in Trek 6, that of the
cameo appearance, carries on full strength into First Contact.
One of the cameos, that of the Emergency Holodoc is well timed,
but I could have done without hearing Nelix's voice in
Ethan Phillip's (curiously uncredited) cameo in the holodeck,
or Dwight Schultz's utterly pointless cameo as Brocoli (sorry,
Barclay)
My wife and I sat having dinner after the premier wondering if we'd
just watched Aliens again or not.   We finally decided that the best
phrase was 'If imitiation is the sincerest form of flattery,
then James Cameron (Director/writer of Aliens) must be damned flattered'
First Contact is StarTrek meets the Aliens gang.   That is not
all bad, but damn it, this could have been MORE.
Scenes directly calling back the image of chest bursters from Aliens,
a whole mental process of 'If they're going to get assimiliated,
kill them first, its the best for them' down to the claustrophobia
of the combat scenes in the corridors of the Enterprise felt pulled
from Aliens.
Data and Jean-Luc save the Enterprise, save Zephram Cochrane, save
humanity yet again. The scene changes, and beam off they go,
hop onto the Big E, and whiz, snap bang, back through time
end of movie.
WOULD SOMEONE in the STAR TREK UNIVERSE STOP WRITING RESET BUTTON
ENDINGS DAMN IT!!!!!!!!
I stopped watching Voyager because of crappy writing and magical
mystery reset endings in 30 seconds. (plus technobabble etc.)
DS9 still moderately suffers from this disease.
The Enterprise has just had most of its crew assimilated and Borgified,
the ship itself has been collectivized and has been borg modified
from decks 26 up to deck 3 or 4. ( A guess)  They've jettisoned the
deflector dish for crying out loud, and now 'SNAP BANG' off to warp?
Even a ' Captain's Log: we've spent 2 weeks in orbit repairing
damage to the Enterprise and rigging a new deflector emitter.
We now bid farewell to earth of the past with new hope"
Something like that...
Anyways, First Contact managed to in 2 1/2 minutes of film to
damn near ruin my enjoyment of the film. Too bad...
Incidently:  The Defiant gets thoroughly trashed at the beginning
of the movie.. Anyone wondering if DS9 will have a throw in it
to provide an 'absence' of the Defiant for a few episodes while
it gets repaired?   Given Trek's inability to provide for
continuity, I'm not counting on it...
First Contact is worth seeing.  Some bloody annoying weaknesses that
are unfortunately endemic to the entire Trek universe as
corrupted by Rick Berman, but still worth seeing.
--
Jonathan P. Crone  P.Eng    613-763-8624 Fax 613-763-5568  ESN:393-8624
BNR  PCS Systems Development         cronejp@bnr.ca

Author
Rick Kelvington
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
First let me say, you probably won't like this review.  If your a big Star
Trek fan, (like I am) you should probably stop reading now, and pick up a
twinkee, or other food product that will give you some level of enjoyment.
 I guarantee you this review will not.  My personal favorite, is the
Hostess Cupcake.
For those of you that have decided to continue on, here are the rules:
1. This is a review and story synopsis, not a criticism of a life style or
clothing choice.
2. You can not flame me, if you are over your target weight by more than
twenty pounds, or need a belt which exceeds 46 inches.
3. If you went to the theater more than 3 hours before the film started,
you may not flame me.
4. If you went to the theater in a Star Fleet Uniform, or wore more than
three star trek communicator pins, you may not flame me and finally...
5. If you think I am sleeping with your wife, girlfriend or daughter, you
are probably not a big enough of a star trek fan to even bother to flame
me.
I wanted to like this movie, I really, really did.  We needed to have one
hit out of the park, the Star Trek franchise is starting to show it age.
Now as a review of a movie, you can only take into account the things that
happened on the screen, (which in my case also includes the previews) and
the reaction of the audience, which in my book is somewhat secondary.
Please note that anyone wearing a Klingon costume, or dressed as a Romulan
does not technically count as an objective audience member.
The day started promisingly enough, with a delightful ticket taker, a few
short previews, and no over acted computer animations telling me to shut
up or throw away my trash.  The theater was very full, nearly 80% of it's
capacity.  People waited with baited breath to see the continuing
adventures of Picard, Riker and the rest of the gang.  But then a
surprise, a preview which had a small TV set showing Star Wars on it,
which it turned out to be, was a very good and enjoyable preview of the
re-release of the Star Wars films starting in February of next year, the
preview even had new footage never before seen and killer effects.  The
scene was set.  A good preview, nice ambiance, and some overly buttered
popcorn.
The theater got quiet, as the stars on the Paramount logo came flying into
view, followed by the familiar strains of the Classic Trek music we all
grew up with.  The titles, well they were less than inspiring, no bottle
slowly falling through space, no ships passing by at warp speed.  Just a
reverse Superman type of generic title.  But who cares about titles
anyway, this could still be a good film.
Then we see what has to be the longest pull back shot in history of motion
pictures and I was very excited, effects like this don't come cheap.  This
shot from inside Picard's eye to outer space was awesome!  Then like most
really good things, it turned out to be a dream.  We see Picard on his new
ship, without so much as clue as to how he got there, and where this ship
came from.  Everything seems to be normal except Picard knows the Borg are
about to attack.  Having been Borgified himself several years ago, he
still hears Borg song in his head.
The most ruthless and vile enemy since the goatee Klingons of the sixties,
the Borg.  Part man, part machine, part plastic plumbing.  These
despicable life forms that stagger around like many of Universal Picture's
most famous monsters, are the scourge of the galaxy, why the mere mention
of their name can make a Klingon wet his pants or a make a security
officer wish for the merciful death of a transporter accident.
Personally, I wanted to know how this ship got to be the Enterprise-E, I
wanted to see it's commission, hear stories of it's design, maybe even see
Picard working with the designers on it's construction.  See how they go
the crew to come back and watch as they slowly break orbit for the first
time.  But it was not to be, no matter, it can still be a good film.
Which brings me to my first rule of Acquiescence, just like the rules of
Acquisition that the Frengie use.  The rules of Acquiescence are used to
point out major flaws in logic or rational thinking that they take for
granted in the Star Trek universe.
Rule 1: We don't need to know anything about how people in the Star Trek
universe get new ships, new eyes, or new hair colors for that matter.  We
can just take for a granted that Star Fleet will keep building new ships
as fast as we destroy them.
The scenario is set, the Borg are on the attack.  Will Picard defy orders
and save the universe again, in a mighty battle around Earth, we see Star
Fleet ships tossed about like plastic models being blown to bits by some
intergalactic, M-80 firing, Rebukes cube.  We see Picard, taking over the
fleet and exploiting a weakness in the Borg that he had failed to mention
to Star Fleet command during those long debriefings he must have gone
through all those years ago.
But it seems destroying the Borg ship is not enough, the Borg launch a
huge escape pod or cannon ball like item out of the ship as it blowing up,
this escape pod has the ability to create a field that will allow it to
travel back in time, the Enterprise get's caught in it's wake just long
enough to see what happens when you introduce a dominate species into a
submissive culture, the Borg take over Earth.  By altering it's past.  At
first I had guessed this take over, which the Borg call assimilation, was
done by forcing the people of earth to watch reruns of Regis & Kathy Lee
until the strongest of our race killed themselves, and the rest were just
given an email address and shown how to use a newsgroup until they were
numb and nonresistant.
We soon find out that by following them into this temporal field somehow,
that they plan to take over earth of the present by stopping something out
of Earth's past.  So far the film is off to blistering pace.  The effects
are impressive, the story a little strained but all in all, I still think
I can like this movie.
Rule 2:  You don't need to know how a technology works to use it, the
Enterprise-E is somehow able to create, and then later in the film
utilize, a here to fore unheard of way of traveling in time by making a
cronosmetric field.  Next I expect they will just turn off the
Enterprise's chameleon circuit and the Enterprise will just turn into a
big huge blue police box and be able to travel in time anywhere in time or
space that they want to.
After following the Borg back in time to a post WWIII era decimated Earth,
and deciding that The Borg were trying to stopping the "first contact"
humans had with an alien race, ( a very old reference to an episode of the
original Trek, where Vulcans were the "first contact" made with Earth and
that this helped to save our world)
Rule 3: There are no longer any original ideas that can be developed in
the Star Trek world, or so they would have us believe, without a reference
or major story plot that somehow hinges on information we leaned in Kirks
time.  Soon I expect to read a book called "The world according to, Kirk"
The concept is the Borg will disrupt this meeting, by stopping the first
ever test of a working warp drive ship called the Phoenix.  They try and
do this by firing randomly from space at the area around where the ship is
housed. This well thought out plan and the writers deserve credit for
trying it.  The Borg's plan however, is disrupted by the appearance of the
Enterprise-E in this post apocalyptic earth, when Picard blows the Borg
ball out of the stars with a few well placed torpedo hits.
Rule 4:  Shooting at things on the ground from space seems very difficult.
 You would think that with the technology necessary to travel back in
time, and assimilate races of people, one of them would have been a
tactical officer, capable of hitting one little missile size ship from
their position in space.  Or better yet, don't shoot at the little missile
just blow up the whole damn town, missile, silo and all.
After this blistering assault on the town, the crew of the Enterprise
beams down to find Zefram Cochran and make sure he can still do all the
things necessary to keep Picard's future in tack, and stop the Borg
threat.  Up to this point the story was not bad, and everything was going
along swimmingly.
But unbeknownst to the Captain, and the People on the Enterprise, and the
internal sensors, and the crew in general, some of the Borg have beamed
over to the Enterprise and are starting to in a very "Aliens" like way,
take over the ship a few decks at a time.  In scenes that seem all too
familiar, where doomed crew members call out to each other, like they are
looking for Jones the cat, instead of asking the computer where their
shipmates are, they slowly one by one get pulled into the Borg collective.
Rule 5: The most powerful computer in the universe can be taken for
granted when it would be convenient to ask it a question about a fellow
crewman or something even more benign like "Computer, why is it so hot in
here?" or "Computer, are there any Borg around the next corner?".
Picard, Data, and eventually Crusher and Lilly (whose role in the film is
never really clear) return to the ship while the others look for Cochran.
Once there, Picard discovers that it appears the Borg, somehow managed to
beamed over undetected, while their ship was exploding, and are
systematically taking over parts of the ship including engineering.  After
a few moments a plan is set into place to destroy part of the Enterprise's
warp core cooling system, and that in turn will kill the organic parts of
the Borg.  Also the computer systems are locked out from the Borg by Data
who encrypts them so well, that even drilling holes in his head won't get
them out.  I had a little problem with the holes being drilled in Data's
head scene, his skin seemed very wooden like as bits of saw dust came from
his skull, and these holes never show up again later in the film, which is
a nice little flub on their part.
Picard runs into Dr. Crusher's patient Lilly, while trying to make his way
back to the bridge, a women who is Cochran's, friend, wife or maybe just a
lover, it's very unclear, and the two of them work their way back to the
bridge.  In doing so they encounter the Borg who chase them through a
holographic program, where Picard conjures up a Tommy gun and kills the
Borg who are following them.  One point that is clearly brought out is
that the bullets in the gun are not just holographic ones but are more
real thanks in part to a few well placed commands that take all the safety
precautions off of the holodeck.  We saw this several times during the run
of all the current Star Trek series.
Rule 6: Holographic bullets don't kill people, it's the over rides that
do.
Picard takes a part out of the dead Borg, and plugs it into the top of his
tricorder to help further the plot, and find out what the Borg are up to.
Rule 7: You can plug anything into a tricorder and it will interface
perfectly.  It seems the writers of this film have seen "Independence Day"
and have determined that a computer, is a computer and they all speak
exactly the same language in exactly the same way, and will talk to each
other perfectly well.  You can take what ever is lying around, plug it
into the top of a tricorder and retrieve information from it, obviously
tricorders must be running the Macintosh operating system.
Back on Earth they are searching for Cochran and trying to see if they can
fix the ship in time for tomorrow morning's early lift off.  After a time
and few drinks, the crew catches up with Cochran and they convince him, he
must complete his mission in order to save their future.
Rule 8: Post nuclear Earth is the perfect time for building a warp drive,
it seems the parts and equipment must just be lying around waiting to be
assembled.  Even if it a takes a while to find enough titanium.
By this time I was starting to ask myself a lot of questions about the
plot, but I figured, I must hang on I'm sure this is going somewhere, I
can stay the course for a few more scenes.  Besides how often do we get to
see Trio drunk?
Cochran who is anything but noble and heroic (which was a touch I really
liked), gets so spooked by the hero worship from the Enterprise crew,
(including an all to brief appearance by the bumbling and socially inept
Barkley).  That he goes and runs away and is eventually phasered into
doing his duty bit for the future.
Rule 9:  The boys from Temporal Investigations frown on shooting
historical figures with phasers.  What's wrong with a good old fashion
punch or a blanket party, do we have to shoot everyone who is the least
bit cranky with a phaser?
On the ship after a long and somewhat boring non-battle and wrestling
match with the Borg, where we see somewhat Borgified crew members get
phasered to death by their Captain, and Data who all but breaks the head
off one the Borg only to be captured by one of the oldest tricks in the
books.
Rule 10:  There seems there is only one door on the Enterprise-E which
open up, and Data just happens to be standing in front of it at the time
when the Borg raise it just enough to recognize his Bruno Molly boot and
pull him under it.
It's determined that the Borg, who have been whipping the asses of
everyone on the ship so far, need reinforcements, which it seems are
located somewhere in the delta quadrant.  No doubt setting traps for
Voyager to stumble into in the next few years.  They will get these
reinforcements by attaching a type of homing beacon to the main deflector
dish and sending for them.  I can only hope the Borg's Seti program is
better than ours, or chances are they would never hear it.
Picard, Worf and Hawk, not the same one from "Buck Rogers" fame, but a
mere body to be killed later decide that the only way to stop them is to
go and do an EVA (Extra Vehicular Ascent) walkabout on the ship and
destroy the deflector from the outside.
Data on the other hand is being tempted by the sins of the flesh by the
Borg Queen.  Who one can say, despite all her obvious flaws and faults is
not spineless.  As a matter of fact she is head and shoulders above the
rest.  She is lowered into her waiting Bat suit of body armor and entices
Data to join her in her quest for perfection.  Eventually she seduces him
and for the moment it seems he has "Come one with the Borg".
Rule 11: Never have sexual relations with a women who has no body.  It's
just plain bad form.
Picard, Worf, and the soon to be dead crewmen, go outside of the bridge to
where the deflector dish is, when they get there they see the Borg setting
up the homing beacon.  Now one very interesting thing to note during the
fight sequence that takes place is that the Borg don't need space suits to
breath in outer space.  Picard and Worf manage to destroy the beacon
before it is activated.  This type of scene has always been a pet peeve of
mine, there is no way to do a zero gravity scene well, unless you spend
endless time and money on it.  Everyone who flew looked as if they rejects
from "The Peter Pan School of Flying".  This was also the scene where I
had pretty much given up on the film,  by the time Worf said "Assimilate
this!" I was well on my way to a frown.
Rule 12:  It is very, very cold in space and organic materials do not
respond well to the vacuum of space.  You would think that even if they
don't have to breath (see Rule 13) their faces, and other organic parts
would pretty much either seize up, or just plain explode in the absolute
zero of outer space.  It is mentioned very early on in the film that the
Borg like 38 plus degrees Celsius, so how do all those mechanical and
organic parts function so well in outer space.  This was a big mistake.
Rule 13:  Some type of humanoids do not have to breath in outer space, the
list includes Superman, Space Ghost and obviously The Borg!!!  Even if you
were mostly mechanical, you would think that your collective brain would
have told you to take an oxygen mask with you for your organic side.
Back on the ground the warp ship is being readied and launched, with the
help of Riker and LaForge who tag along for the ride, which I'm sure is a
breach of time travel etiquette.  Fortunately the cockpit has seating for
three, and we can only hope that Cochran's previous co-pilots were thrown
on the funeral pyres before Riker and LaForge took their places.  As they
travel into space and start their trek, things on the Enterprise are not
going so well.
After losing more ground to the Borg, and a bitter talking to by Lilly,
who did an excellent impression of Guianan, but I'm sure that was just a
coincidence and it had nothing to do with the fact that Whoopi Goldberg
wasn't in the picture.  Also in this scene we see all the previous ships
that have the Enterprise name attached to them.  The ones that get broken
looked just like the models you get in the store except they were gold
plated, in this very, very expensive film, this looked really cheesy.
Picard decides to destroy the Enterprise and have the crew abandon ship.
Crusher asks, "Do you think they build another one?"  Good question, since
we seem to be going through them at an amazing rate.  I wondered why not
just separate the ship and leave the Borg the bottom half and then destroy
the bottom half of the ship while they had the chance.
Rule 14:  There is only one type of allegory that works, a literary one.
If you are not well versed in the classics you will never understand why
you do things.
Everything seems to being going well for Cochran and his ship the Phoenix
as they approach the light barrier.  I did notice one very striking
similarity between the Phoenix and the original star ship Enterprise, the
Nacelles seemed very familiar.  Maybe this was an omage, or maybe Nacelles
just have to look that way.
Picard attempts a rescue of Data and runs into the Borg Queen.  Offering
himself as a mate for her if she will let Data go.  It seem she was on the
Borg ship all those years ago, we just never saw her, or ever heard about
her, or had any clue as to her existence before this film.
Rule 15:  You can destroy a Borg vessel without any apparent survivors
drifting in the wreckage and yet the Borg Queen will get away and will
mock you for your very linear thinking for not understanding how she could
have survived?  Go figure.
After Data is released from the Borg Queen's force field he gives the
impression that he is actually on the Borg's side, just long enough to
send a few torpedo bearing down on the Phoenix.  The torpedo eventually
miss their target and the jump to light speed for the Phoenix  attained.
Data then implements the plan to destroy the Borg by allowing the engine
cores cooling system to pore out into the engineering deck, while Picard
looking like Stallone in "Cliff Hanger" climbs out of the way of the
boiling vapor which kills most of the Borg and disables the queen.
Rule 16:  You don't need warp core coolant to keep your star ship engine
cool.  It seems after you spill it out every where the core is just fine,
even if you don't have an engineer or any crew to fix the damage.
The Borg Queen or what's left of her and her Bat suit, are finally killed
by Picard who while doing a promotional tie-in with "Mortal Combat - The
Next Generation", takes out her spine and snaps it in two.  He then goes
over to Data who has had his new fleshy self boiled away by the coolant
leak, and who now resembles Arnold Schwarzenegger in the "Terminator"
movies, get set to recall the crew and repair the ship.
On Earth, all is right with the world, the warp experiment has attracted
the notice of an alien race, the Vulcans.  I was stunned that people in
the audience didn't know what was about to happen when the Star Trek
mythos clearly states our First Contact was with them.  They land and
emerge from their craft, in a very "E.T" like scene, speaking perfect
mid-west English (long before the invention of the universal translator)
and giving the basic Vulcan welcome of "Live long and prosper".
We learn the Vulcans never knew the Enterprise and here crew were there
due to the moon gravitational fields, and we have figured out not only how
to generate this cronosmetric field, but how to return to our own time
using it.
Rule 17:  Transporters do not set of sensor alarms of any type on a vulcan
ship.
The movie ends with a scene very familiar in look and feel to "Star Trek
V: The Final Frontier", all that was missing were the strains of "Row,
Row, Row Your Boat", and people getting drunk.  Well we actually do have
Cochran getting the Vulcans drunk, which I thought was an interesting
little movie moment.  Welcome to Earth, have a drink!
All in all the movie was very flawed, with only the performances of the
major cast members making it worth while.
The acting was very good, a particular nod goes to Frakes for not putting
himself in the movie too much, and to McFadden for having more hair styles
in a single movie than Emelda Marco has shoes.  I also like seeing Troi
drunk, it was a classic Trek moment.
The effects were spectacular, as always.  We have come to expect the best
from ILM.  They delivered seamless and believable effects from the opening
shots through the very end.  My favorite has to be the pull back from
Picard's eye to outer space.  It will go down in the history of Trek as
being unforgettable.  The weakest effects, and this isn't ILM fault was
the Zero-G stuff, it still looked like people hanging from wires, even if
those wires have been digitally removed.
The music was way too familiar, and I thought James Horner stole from his
own work, this sound track was choppy at best and didn't add anything to
film, if anything I would have like to been without it when it was
drowning out some of the dialog between Riker and Cochran.
The direction, was slow and plodding, it was a good first outing for
Frakes, but it was way to slow for a Star Trek film, I kept waiting for it
to pick up, and it never did.  I also think the film was about ten minutes
too long, a lot of things could have been cut.  Namely, half of the Zero-G
stuff, and half of the dialog about Cochran being such a hero.
The writing was rather bland, there was no new ground broken here, I also
have always hated the idea of rewriting history.  I did enjoy seeing
Picard still having trouble dealing with his encounter with the Borg from
six years ago. But by adding the Borg Queen concept when it never existed
there before was just plain cheating, and to add insult to injury having
her escape the original fate of the Borg was just a slap in the face to
the writers of the "Best of Both Worlds".
I loved seeing the Emergency Holographic Doctor and Nelix's alter ego from
"Voyager" there, they were very funny.  Also Barkley added a nice moment
and will certainly spawn a five dollar action figure for is five seconds
of screen time.
Overall, the production values were high, the risk great.  But Star Trek -
First Contact, just never connected for me.  Maybe I was expecting too
much, maybe they just can't make a good Trek film without the original
crew, or maybe it reminded me just a little too much of Star Trek V.
Whatever the reason, it's obvious that Trek needs fixing.  Maybe new
writers or killing a major cast member is in order.  What ever the answer
is, I hope it comes before we see, "Star Trek Voyager - The Movie".

Author
Steve Rhodes
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
     When a new Star Trek comes out, there is always excitement in the
air.  Star Trek has fans like no other series.  Trekkies have almost a
religious devotion to the series.  I still remember the first time I
met a master level Trekkie.  I was at a party where a TV was playing,
and she was reciting not some, but all the lines before the characters
spoke them.  I stared in awe at her.  This review is not for her or her
likes.  This review of STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT is aimed at the rest of
us.  She will undoubtedly recognize and appreciate nuances in the
picture that mere mortals will miss.
     First, an admission.  I have seen some of the films in the Star
Trek series but not all.  Some I've liked, and some I haven't.  I do
not remember any that were bad nor any outstanding.  As a non-devotee,
I find the films good solid entertainment, but nothing more.  This is
not meant as a put-down.  As a critic, it is a relief not to have every
film try to force your emotional systems into a complete meltdown.
Being able to kick back and just enjoy an old fashion adventure is a
welcome respite for my nervous system.
     "I am a computer cyborg.  Resistance is futile," says Captain
Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) remembering the time six years ago
when the Borgs assimilated him.  He is healthy now, but the earth
isn't.
     The Borgs have gone back in time to the year 2063 so they can stop
earth's first contact with an alien spacecraft.  If they can do that,
they will populate the earth with nothing but Borgs.  The film is about
the Captain and his crew aboard the newly commissioned U. S. S.
Enterprise-E as they follow the Borgs back in time so they can stop
them.  This plot device lets much of the movie be filmed in a pine
forest.
     The Borgs start taking over the Enterprise, and try torture on
those they capture.  "I am unlike any life forms you have ever
encountered before," tells Lt. Commander Data (Brent Spiner) to the
Borg Queen (Alice Krige).  He asserts that he can not be broken.  She
resorts to that age old temptation -- sex.  While he is strapped down,
she blows over the new skin on his arm and purrs at him, "Was that good
for you?"  The script by Rick Berman, Brannon Braga, and Ronald Moore
never takes itself too seriously.  The show is peppered with little
bits of humor.
     The twenty-first century earth hero of the story is the original
inventor of the warp drive, Zefram Cochrane (James Cromwell from BABE).
Costume designers Robert Blackman and Deborah Everton chose the outfit
of a geriatric hippie for him.  Cromwell has great fun playing the part
of a reluctant legend who would rather drink whiskey than do anything
else.  His goal is to get rich and find a desert island full of naked
women, but his destiny is to have high schools named after him instead.
     When Alfre Woodard (HOW TO MAKE AN AMERICAN QUILT), playing
Cochrane's sidekick Lily Sloane, is taken up in the Enterprise, she has
a rude awakening.  As she looks wide-eyed back down to earth, the
Captain explains to her, "You are not in Montana anymore."  This is one
of many homages to older movies.
     When Lily and Picard become trapped by the Borgs, they turn a room
into a 1930's dancehall so that they can get an old fashioned Tommy gun
to mow down the Borgs.  The show is full of logical flaws like this.
Why didn't he just dream up the gun?  Why the whole room full of
dancing strangers?  Logic, of course, is not the point, and the scene
is a colorful diversion.
     Woodard gets to say some of the cornier lines including, "It's my
first ray gun," and "watch your caboose."  Her performance, however, is
too removed.  She never gets in sync with the rhythm of a science
fiction film.  Brent Spiner as Data is the most fun to watch.  Quite a
complement to Stewart's brooding as the Captain.  Lily makes fun of
this with, "Captain Ahab has to have his whale."  At times, the show
takes itself seriously as when Picard barks out about the Borg battle,
"The line has to be drawn here.  This far and no farther."
     Having recently watched sci-fi films from 50's classics to STAR
WARS to INDEPENDENCE DAY, I found the special effects by Terry Frazee
in STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT closer to the hokey 50s' material.  Watch
especially the cheap model they used in the scene where they look up at
the Enterprise from a telescope on earth.  I once read that the reason
the studio likes the STAR TREK series is that since they are relatively
inexpensive to film, they are always quite profitable.  STAR TREK films
have a basic appeal, and fancy effects would probably just detract
anyway.
     STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT is directed by Jonathan Frakes who plays
number one, known more formally as Commander William Riker.  Like an
old orchestra, the cast seems to run on auto-pilot so I still have
little opinion on his directorial skills.
     The final question becomes: Is there enough here for non-Trekkies,
and I think the answer is yes.  A completely forgettable, but pleasant
enough time at the your local Bijou.  A good popcorn movie.
     STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT runs about 1:50.  I missed getting the
press kit at the screening, but that is about what my watch said.  The
film is rated PG-13 for cartoonish violence and a few profanities.
There is no sex or nudity.  The film would be fine for kids, but my
guess is that they would need to be 8 or 9 to understand it.  I give
the picture a thumbs up and rate it ** 1/2.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
Denes House
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
The following contains significant spoilers for the movie Star Trek:
First Contact. Reading the review before seeing the movie may spoil
some fans' enjoyment of the film, though I studiously avoid giving
away the end, or the culmination of any plot point.
The film opens (after some eye-sore credits) with a spectacular pull-back
from within the eye of Captain Picard (Patrick Stewart) to show that he
is trapped within the monstrous hive-ship of the evil Borg collective. The
sequence recounts Picard's "assimilation" into the collective years
earlier, and sets up some of his key character motivations for the rest of
the film.
The Borg, as fans of the Star Trek: The Next Generation television series
will know, are perhaps the most fearsome foe the crew of the Enterprise
has ever faced. Part organic, part machine, the Borg are relentless in
their drive to assimilate the genetic and technological distinctives of
cultures that they encounter into their own. Assimilation is painful and
brings all individual minds into a collective hive-mind, losing all
individuality, and becoming part of the "all." Interestingly enough, what
Star Trek sees as evil, Isaac Asimov promoted as the highest good and
the nature of all reality in his "Foundation" series.
Flash forward several years. The Borg are attacking the Earth once again.
Picard, now captaining the new Enterprise (NCC-1701-E), is ordered to
patrol the Romulan Neutral Zone, rather than join in the fight. Picard bitterly
observes that Starfleet Command probably considers him a risk rather than
an asset because of his unstable feelings towards the Borg. When the battle
goes badly, though, Picard and crew disobey and head for Earth, maximum warp.
The battle is a mess. The U.S.S. Defiant, captained by Deep Space Nine's
Lt. Worf (Michael Dorn) is badly damaged, and her crew beamed aboard the
Enterprise.
Picard assumes command of the battle group, and under his direction, the Borg's
cube ship is completely destroyed - but not before launching a smaller,
spherical ship that plummets towards Earth. The Enterprise pursues the
sphere,
as it begins to generate a temporal vortex.
Realizing that they cannot defeat and assimilate humanity in the present,
the Borgs' plan is to head back in time to prevent the formation of the
United
Federation of Planets, Starfleet, and eventually Picard, by stopping a pivotal
event - humanity's first contact with extra-terrestrial life.
That contact will come the day after Zefram Cochrane (James Cromwell) makes
the first warp-speed flight. The Borg want to stop that flight from happening.
Picard decides to follow the Borg back in time, to stop their evil
machinations, and keep history on the right path.
The resulting movie plays out on three levels. First is Picard's fight
against the Borg onboard the Enterprise, as they try to assimilate the ship
and her
crew. Next is second-in-command Will Riker (Jonathan Frakes)'s quest to ensure
Cochrane takes his epoch-making flight. Finally, there is the struggle as
the Borg seek to assimilate Lt. Commander Data (Brent Spiner) the
Enterprise's android second officer.
Can Picard stop the Borg? Will Data be assimilated? Will Cochrane make his
flight? These are the storylines that drive this film, and fortunately, all
of them turn out to be interesting, character-driven tales.
This is a plot that could easily get confusing, but first-time film director
Jonathan Frakes keeps us in the story, and writers Ronald Moore and Brannon
Braga give us characters to relate to, who bring out all the necessary
explanations.
Each thread of the story unfolds in a fast-paced but clear manner, with strong
implications of what could happen if this does not all work. In other words,
it's compelling.
The story weaves in themes of revenge, duty, destiny, hero-worship,
individuality, loyalty, seduction, temptation, and many more.
Picard is driven by his pain and desire for revenge, along with higher ideals
like protecting his planet and culture, and defeating a foe whose evil
perhaps he alone fully knows. He is seduced by the siren song of revenge,
and is willing to destroy his life, his ship, and his crew in pursuit of
that end.
Data is seduced on a far more immediate level. The simple pleasures of warm
breath blowing across the most intricate sensory network imaginable --
human
skin -- are obviously just as tempting as the sensually evil Borg Queen's
sexual advances. His ultimate desire -- to become more human -- comes
within reach, but the price is the destruction of all that he holds dear.
Cochrane experiences what might be called negative-seduction. The prospect
of being a hero, a "statue," repulse him. He knows his own frailties and is
too honest with himself to want to see himself worshiped. Like the early
Christian missionaries Paul and Barnabas, Cochrane wants to scream, "Why
are you doing this? I am only a man, not a god!" His desire is to run away
from the destiny that awaits him, at the cost of a better future for
humanity.
All three stories achieve their thematic complexity from genuine human
character struggles.
And that is my favorite thing about Star Trek: First Contact. The film has
been praised loudly for its special effects, and they are impressive (see
below). But this movie works first and foremost on a character level. This
is a character-driven, not an action-driven movie. There is furious, tense
action, to be sure -- but all of it is at the service of the plot and the
characters. The action and effects serve the story, not the other way
around.
I was on the phone with my mom, talking with her about "Independence Day,"
which she had just seen on video. Did she enjoy it? "Yes, but you could
just as easily have turned off the sound and enjoyed it just as much." ID4
was all "sound and fury, signifying nothing." First Contact is a movie
about real characters, and ultimately, a movie about US.
Any film that delves into human character as deeply as First Contact does
taps into the well of our self-concept, and challenges us to ask questions
about our own values, motivations, and desires. What drives us? Is is
revenge, sex, or fame? Or is it rationality, loyalty, and nobility? Moore
and Braga's screenplay not only touches on serious themes, but does so by
exploring real characters, brought to life by gifted actors.
In general, the acting in First Contact is superb. Roger Ebert wrote that
Bond movies and Star Trek movies rise and fall based on the quality of
their villains. The Borg, and in particular the Borg Queen (Alice Krige).
Marked by a particularly gruesome, fascinating, frightening and sexy makeup
design, the Borg Queen as played by Krige is a scintilating character, evil
and fearsome yet at times tender and touched by human frailty. She scares
you and seduces you at the same time.
Patrick Stewart is a forceful but focused personality on the screen, at
turns raging or vulnerable, macho or frightened, governed through a
struggle between moral choice and raging passion. His performance is marked
by a brilliant clarity, focusing a turbulent energy. Every minute he is on
the screen he controls the scene, even when his character is out of
control. Stewart is a big-screen presence, commanding respect, winning
trust, inspiring connection in the audience.
Serving as Picard's counter-balance is Alfre Woodard's Lily Sloane, an
equally forceful screen personality, and the character most likely to be
talked about as you leave the film. Woodard is in most scenes with Stewart
through the film's last two acts, and is the only one with him in the
movie's most powerful and pivotal scene. Not only is her character
necessary, her performance needed to be top-notch, and Woodard's was
Oscar-caliber.
Brent Spiner turns in an excellent performance, playing the innocent "son"
being seduced by a gruesome evil. Spiner has commented that he sees Data's
relationship with Picard as being a son/father relationship, and that
shines forth clearly here. Like Ripley going back for Newt in Aliens,
Picard's actions towards Data show the fatherly concern he has for his
android son. Spiner portrays the Last Temptation of Data well, skillfully
causing the audience to wonder just what side he's on.
James Cromwell as Zephram Cochrane is less intense, but quite believable in
his role as reluctant role model for high school kids for centuries to
come. He is not what the audience expects him to be, but he plays a fully
realized character that the audience comes to identify with.
Solid supporting performances were turned in by the whole Next Generation
cast, most notably Michael Dorn as Lt. Worf.
Despite all the rumblings on the Usenet, I did not see any irreconcilable
continuity mistakes in First Contact. Strong reference is made to Data's
emotion chip, to the destruction of the Enterprise, and to Worf's tenure on
Deep Space Nine. The Holographic doctor (Robert Picardo) from Star Trek:
Voyager appears in a priceless scene, and even the starship Bozeman is
mentioned in the opening battle scenes.
The only possible mistake I want to deal with specifically is Zephram
Cochrane's planet of origin. The character of Cochrane was originated in
the Classic Star Trek episode "Metamorphosis" where he was refered to as
"Zephram Cochrane of Alpha Centauri." This has led some Star Trek novelists
and others to speculate that first contact with aliens happened with folks
from Alpha Centauri, or that Cochrane was born on an earth colony on that
planet.
First Contact's timeline makes more sense, but Trek canon must be appeased.
It is highly possible that Cochrane was born on Earth but *settled* on
Alpha Centauri later on in life. In any case, First Contact's assertion
that Cochrane was from Earth does not *directly* contradict any filmed Star
Trek to date.
The special effects were of the "ooh and ahh" variety, causing the audience
to gasp in wonder, but at no time did they dominate either characters or
plot. Frakes uses them as the beautiful tools that they are, and no more.
There are space battle scenes, plasma explosions, space walks on the hull
of the beautiful new Enterprise, and a spectacular escape-pod scene, but
all of it goes simply to telling the story - and that's the way it should
be.
This movie will leave a lasting impression. Darker than any other Trek
film, but complex emotionally and structurally, Star Trek: First Contact
may be the best Trek movie to date, and is an excellent movie by any
standard. Acting, directing, writing, and special effects are all of an
Oscar-quality level, which goes together to create a dynamite film.


Author
David Hines
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
(Previously posted to rec.arts.sf.tv and rec.arts.startrek.current.)
_Star Trek_, like all science fiction and skiffy, requires a certain
amount of suspension of disbelief.  In the best of _Star Trek_, the
only requirement is that the viewer accept the somewhat improbable
universe that the Franchise presents: one in which socialist ideals
reign true; one in which people strive to better themselves and
humanity, as well as all the little fuzzies out there; one in which
poverty and crime and bad luck are things of the past.  In the world
of _Star Trek_, everyone is healthy and happy (or as near either of
those things as possible), and things always work out in the end.
That's a lot to swallow, but provided the viewer can choke that down,
a good time may be had by all.  That is, assuming that we're talking
about good Trek.  Bad Trek tries to get the viewer to swallow too
many horse pills; witness the typical episode of _Voyager_, wherein
we're expected to accept clumsy technobabble, miserable plotting,
and characters who are supposed to be capable doing no end of stupid
things.
_Star Trek: First Contact_'s (hereafter: FC) greatest flaw
is that it has too many horse pills.  That's a pity, because otherwise
it's a surprisingly well-done film: well-acted, well-directed, and
(of course) well-effected.  The devil, as always, is in the writing;
and while the writing is good enough to make FC better than
_Generations_ by roughly an order of magnitude (and does something
interesting below the surface -- I'll get to *that* in a minute),
it's not good enough to make me stand up and cheer the movie as a
complete success.  It's decent, in the neighborhood of two and a
half to three stars out of four, but it would require more work to
make it stand tall.  Well worth your time at a matinee; don't spend a
gazillion bucks on a night ticket, unless you have access to a theater
with a mega-huge screen and great sound system.
Spoilers follow 30 blank lines and a ^L.
Thankfully, most of the painful swallowing takes place at the
beginning.  If the Federation can't trust Picard, why isn't he safely
behind a desk?  If the situation was so critical, why didn't the admiral
order *Riker* to take command of the Enterprise?  Didn't the Federation
even try to make a stand outside the Sol system?  Why didn't the Borg
travel back to the twentieth century before attacking Earth (it would've
been much easier, and wouldn't have resulted in the loss of the cube)?
Why did Picard's trick work?  Why did he know about it, and not tell
anyone else in Starfleet before now?  Why was the Enterprise
able to hang around for a minute or so before zapping back in time
with the Borg's hole in time?  Why were they able to follow the Borg
at all?  I could have swallowed one or two of these problems; coming
in so quickly, and so closely on each other's heels, they were utterly
indigestible and made the opening of FC almost entirely unwatchable.
That's not to say there's not more swallowing to be done elsewhere
in the film; there is, a mixture of bitter pills small (such as the
Borg assimilation time being reduced to a few seconds, "inoculation"
against radiation poisoning) and large (such as Picard's fight with Worf,
which I'll get to).  It's just that the beginning forces the viewer to
swallow a lot of horse pills in very little time.  The effects are
beautiful, but the medicine that gets the movie going is *very*
bitter, and needs more than a generous spoonful of eye-candy to
help it go down.
Once the pills are choked down, however, a people-oriented plot
takes over.  Thank Cthulhu, because that's where Trek is strong, and
because the caliber of the actors is such that it can smooth over
rough spots, provided the spots are *relatively* far apart.  The cast
members deliver fine performances, particularly James Cromwell,
Alfre Woodard, Alice Krige, and Patrick Stewart.  (It's a bit annoying
that most of the best roles went to non-featured players; I get
the feeling that Sirtis and McFadden would have killed for an eighth
of the screen time Alfre Woodard got... then again, neither of them
is as good an actor as Woodard.)  There are wobbles, from time to
time; however, once the godawful beginning is left in the dust,
FC begins to move and becomes a pretty enjoyable movie, largely
because of the performances and direction.
There are, however, two major exceptions to the rule.  Both of them,
oddly enough, have to do with Picard.  The first is Picard's fight with
Worf, his refusal to down the ship, followed by an argument with Lily
and a sudden reversal.  The acting is fine; I don't have a problem with
it (Woodard, especially, shone in that scene).  The problem is that it
comes out of nowhere.  Picard hates the Borg; we know that.  But his
sudden lunacy doesn't feel right.  Stewart acts it well, but the script
doesn't give us enough of a reason to buy it.  It has set us up to
see Picard as a Borg-hater, but one who has some reason to believe he
can defeat the Borg where no one else could.  Until the scene in
question, we haven't seen Picard as seriously unstable; we've seen him
as strongly affected by what the Borg are doing, yes, but no reason
to see him like this.
I'd easily have been able to accept the scene if Picard was shown to
have an over-inflated view of his own capabilities; if he *knew* he
was going to win, and didn't scream about it, then I'd buy it.  It
would have worked largely as staged; the crew could have bought in,
with only Lily disbelieving him.  Ahab wasn't a screaming lunatic;
although he did rant on occasion, he was passionate and strong enough
to convince his crewmen, to win them over with strength of personality.
Picard came off like a spoiled child.
The second problem comes just after this:  Picard goes to get Data,
but he doesn't seem to give a rat's ass about the *other* Enterprise
crewmen who've been assimilated?!?  I find that creepy, to say the
least; while I realize that Data is the only regular threatened by
the Borg, you'd think Picard would feel a bit sorry for all those
Ensigns Throwaway.  Just for a second.  Maybe even try to do something
for *them.*  Just a thought, y'know.
I realize that my review up to now has been largely negative, so here,
without further ado, are some Things They Got Right:
Although the Picard-as-Ahab scene didn't work for me, I was delighted
that they *tried* it.  A *fallible* character is a zillion times better
than an infallible one; Trek has been rightly criticized for its
unbelievably infallible characters -- and for its fallible characters
whose dumbest screw-ups never get more than a mild rebuke -- and
the fact that the Trek folks realized this error, and tried to correct
it, pleases the hell out of me.  Now, if they'll just start taking
this attitude on the series more often...
The zero-g fight pleased me.  Not just because it was pretty accurate,
but because it took place on the *underside* of the Enterprise hull.
Three-dimensional thinking, *at last!*
Direction, direction, direction.  Here's hoping Frakes gets more
mainstream directing gigs, so he doesn't have to host any more of those
goddamned UPN paranormal shows!
The fact that they went to an honest effort, instead of just going
through the motions.  Of course, now that I've *seen* that even Brannon
Braga can make a try, I'll be even more harsh on their miserable flops
from now on. *grin*
And, last, a funny subtext.  Trek has made social commentary on many
things before, but FC saw Trek commenting on Trek... and doing it in
a very interesting way.  I don't think anyone else has commented on
this, but when it hit me during the film I doubled up and came close
to ROTFL.
Here, I'll tell you when it hit me; see if you can get it.  It hit
me *hard* in the scene in which Zephram Cochrane, Riker, and LaForge
are sitting in the little cockpit, and Cochrane discusses his reasons
for building the ship.  He's not building it for hope, for the future,
or for any of the reasons the history books suggest.  Cochrane's motive
is money (although how he expects to become filthy rich in a world whose
infrastructure has been largely devastated is a *really* good question).
He doesn't have a vision.  He just wants cash, naked women, and a nice
strong drink.
The funny thing is that posterity idealizes Zephram Cochrane.  They
build statues and monuments to his memory.  They write him up as a
great man, as being just shy of the Second Coming, as being a hero.
But Zephram Cochrane is none of those things.  He's a lecherous, drunken
reprobate who did what he did for purely material reasons.
Zephram Cochrane is *Gene Roddenberry.*
I haven't seen anyone comment on this interpretation yet -- and that
surprises me; I'd think someone would have.  For me, Trek's spoofing
of its creator's own unlikely pop-culture icon status was probably
the best part of the movie.  It gives the film a bit of a subversive
bite for the viewer who looks below the surface, and I think it redeems
some of the surface's flaws.  FC still isn't a perfect movie, and you'll
note that it shies away from spoofing the problems that plague Trek
today... but the fact that it goes back to its roots and pisses on
them in the same movie is *really* delightful.
And that, in a nutshell, is that.  Nicely-made, well-done movie; flawed
but still very enjoyable.  If it weren't for the inept beginning, I'd
give it three stars out of four; as it is, I'm giving it two and a half
for being an honest effort with a sprinkling of some really nice stuff.
Here's hoping the next one is better, and - more importantly - that
Brannon Braga learned something from this movie and brings the fruits
of his knowledge onto _Voyager_.
Well, I can dream, right?  Anyway, FC is a good start; let's see Trek
start cranking out more good stuff.  Maybe the next Trek movie will
be even better.

Author
Scott Derby
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
One must always keep in mind that there are many ways to critique a
film.  You can stand back and judge it on its own merit and not refer
back to previous works of the same type or even of the same series.
You can judge it based upon what YOU wanted out of the film rather than
on many broad categories.  For example: I like romance and this film had
a lot of it, so I liked the film.  This is in contrast to: Well, I like
romance, but there was not a very strong plot or well developed characters,
so I didn't like it so much.
>From the perspective of a general, run-of-the-mill science fiction film
for the general audience with general expectations, Star Trek: First
Contact is a very good film.  It combines good (but by no means ground
breaking) special effects, action, suspense, and snappy dialog; all
wrapped up in good performances by the characters who matter most.
For the movie goer with no expectations and is interested in science
fiction, Star Trek: First Contact will not disappoint.
>From the die-hard trekker/trekkie/trekophile/trekomaniac perspective,
this film will be a slight to huge letdown.  All the hype and all the film
trailers gave the impression of a titanic struggle filled with phasers
and photons against the dreaded nemesis of the Federation: The Borg.
In reality, those who go to see the action equated with a pro wrestling
match will end up seeing a chess game.  The action is limited and shows
absolutely no imagination whatsoever.  The sole scene worth note has
the newly minted Enterprise "E" zooming into a sector where Picard
sends out a subspace communication that he is "taking command of the
battle" due to the death of the admiral in charge.  Of course, everyone
complies within seconds and follows a strange order to fire together
at a seemingly useless section of the Borg ship/cube.  This leads to the
destruction of the Borg ship.  All this action take a scant few minutes
and involves no tactical analysis or real drama.  But that early in the
film, you are deluded enough to believe that this is the mere appetizer,
the good stuff is on the way.  The problem is... it never comes.
What we are treated to is a half-hearted effort at good action and drama.
The following are a few of my gripes in no particular order...
Someone once said (and I probably paraphrase), "The last bastion of the
scoundrel is prayer".  In the Trek universe, the last bastion of the
writer with no talent is the "Let's go back in time" script or the
"Let's do a holodeck episode" script.  We are treated to the former, and
given a taste of the latter (which is one of the better moments in the
film).  What drives me nuts about the incessant desire for the writers
to go back in time is the question: "Where does it ever end?"  Is
our future as humanity going to be the never-ending return to the "old,
savage days of the late 20th and early 21st century?"  So, now that
the Borg are stopped in this film (like they would win), will they not
just come back a week earlier next time and try again?  The problem
with time travel is that a conflict is never quite settled unless you
go back to the source (like Picard did when he saw the "slime" becoming
sentient or whatever deep philosophical dronings were offered by Q
in "All Good Things" [I think it was All Good Things... correct me if
I am wrong]).  This writing is the fallback of one with no imagination.
This all follows the same old, tired lines....
"Oh no!  If we save Joan Collins' character on 20th century earth,
life as we know it will change forever!"
"Oh no!  If we don't let the Enterprise C get destroyed helping the Klingons,
life as we know it will change forever!"
"Oh no!  If we don't stop the Borg from gaining control of early 21st
century earth, life as we know it will change forever!"
Insert your favorite here. I'm reeeeeeeeeealy tired of this scenario.
Why does every Trek episode for the last few years have to have some
deep meaning or message to humanity?  Granted, this one is not as bad
as some of the past episodes and/or films, yet I'm soooooo very tired
of being referred to as the "barbaric 20th century".  "Oh, thank the
powers that be that we have evolved to where we don't go after money
or personal gain!  No!  We are now a higher species."  I really, really
want to puke.  It is so easy to sit in a directors chair and in the
writers chair and hurl accusations without offering any REAL solace or
solution to the problems of mankind.  What we get in this episode is:
If you meet an alien (in this case, a Vulcan) you will become
enlightened.  Just like in Independence Day (which I felt was better,
but still had a crappy script/dialog), the discovery of alien life
seemed to "bring us together".  I do know that every film needs a
story and it is nice to have a positive message, but as a non-elected
representative of the 20th century, I am sick of being beaten up.
3) Too little action... too much talk.
As is typical of many Trek films/shows, there is way too much talk and
far too little action.  I think I would not have minded so much if I
didn't feel that Paramount had deliberately deceived the Trek fans
by putting all the action scenes into the trailers.  This film is
long on tongue and short on phasers.  If you feel that this is a
barbaric perspective, fine.  Just one man's perspective.  But I really
am not interested in a 24th century version of "My Dinner With Andre".
There is hand to hand combat and lots of personal phaser stuff, but
it is a drag.  I was not on the edge of my seat once.
4) Sub-plot was a total waste of my time.
I really don't care a rat's butt about the inventor of Warp technology.
There was WAY too much time spent listening to a character that really
had NOTHING to do with the story in any real sense.  All the dialog
that was wasted could have been better spent going back to the 24th
century and seeing what was happening (is Sulu still around?).  Maybe
a starship conflict or two.  All this drinking and rock 'n roll and
such was a total distraction.  In my opinion they needed somewhere to
stick Riker, Troi and LeForge.  They could have accomplished their
goal of making us know of the importance of meeting the Vulcans without
wasting all that time (not that I think the idea was any good to start).
5) Great... Just what we need, a human Borg.
What is the deal with this Borg leader?  Are we trying to portray a
"kinder, gentler Borg?"  In the TV show we are introduced to a
savage, no compromise, no talk, no hope enemy in the Borg.  It was
one of the most wonderful times in Trek or even Sci-Fi history in
my opinion.  They evoked terror in the hearts of even the most
seasoned space explorer.  It is only through the most brilliant
cunning that the enemy can be overcome.  In this film, the Borg do
not have the same presence of terror.  Hey, if you can have sex with
a Borg, how bad can they be, eh Data?  I will say that the Borg looked
much nicer in the film.  They had a nasty, grittiness to them.
They sure made fast work of the Enterprise decks!  Maybe we need to
get some Borg workers on the job when we are building highways and
bridges.  This never ending prattling about Data's emotions and
need to be a human are starting to get tiresome too.  I likened this
thread to having Arnold Schwartzenegger sitting down with an alien
bent on destruction and talking about why they feel the need to
fight all the time.  And I REALLY doubt that the Borg would have
sent only one ship to attack Earth in the first place.  Ah well...
it must have cut down on the special effects costs.
6) The characters are going to have to accept their place in the films.
Most people (this is a generalization) want to see Picard and Data do
something.  You will need a good enemy (seems like we just ruined the
best enemy the Federation ever had) and a guest star good guy/gal.
Everyone else HAS to figure out that while they are VERY important in
the Trek universe and to the evolution of the story, we don't need to
see them or hear them so much.  That little scene with a drunk Troi
was a total waste of film.  We need her to say "I feel..." a few times
or even an "I sense..." and that is about it.  Beverly Crusher needs
to fix the sick and perhaps give a small amount of "conscience" to
Jean Luc: period.  Geordi, you need to keep the Big E up and running
and come up with some revolutionary means of increasing power and
reinitializing the warp chamber reactions: period.
Riker and Worf are the second tier.  They need to be there for more
action, versus the intellectual and diplomatic foil of Picard and
the robotic genius of Data.  In the original Trek, Kirk and Spock did
the stuff with McCoy and Scotty in the background but still important.
In the New Trek, Picard and Data run the show, Riker and Worf support
them.  Everyone else is decoration, albeit very important decoration.
You can't give everyone a great line or important role in a 2 hour movie.
If they want that, then they should have stayed on TV.  Everyone can
be explored when you have 26 episodes per year.  When you have 2 hours,
you have no time to waste.  To be fair, it could have been worse in
this film.
7)  What is the deal with all these jokes?
Don't get me wrong, I like a good joke as much as the next guy.  But
is it me or do the Star Trek writers think that they need to insert
75 jokes per film now?  I though I was in the wrong movie when I went
to see the moronic whale related Trek movie years ago.  Is seems to have
started a trend.  If the boys and girls on the Big E want to do stand
up, give them a mike.  A "few" well placed lines are great... but really!
I know this is a diatribe, but I guess I just needed to vent.  I am
your typical "I want phaser fire, action, suspense, phaser fire,
special effects, good vs. evil, phaser fire" kind of Star Trek fan.
I realize that the folks at Paramount need to broaden their audience
(read non-trekkers and especially women) to make more of a profit.
But I feel like Trek is not mine anymore.  If it were not for "The
Wrath of Khan", I don't know if there would have ever been a Trek
film I liked.  The world is changing and I guess I am a dinosaur
who is doomed to extinction.  Patrick Stewart is awesome.  He is
the finest actor and captain ever placed on the bridge of the
Enterprise.  Brent Spiner has created a character that rivals that
of Spock, which is tough to do.  But all the "life" of Trek is
being squeezed out.  The need for self-actualization in Trek
characters and the need for Trek writers to preach their gospel
of the month (the futility of the cold war, environmentalism,
save the whales, etc.) has sucked the life out of one of the most
significant media phenomena in history.  You combine this with
the moronic "if I can't direct it, I'm not gonna be in it" and
"I need more lines and more money or I'm not gonna be in it"
foolishness that happened to the last Trek regime, I think it
would be best just to kill it and save us all the grief of
watching our beloved die a slow, painful death at the hands of
idiots.  HIRE WRITERS WHO LOVE TREK, NOT MONEY!!!  Jonathan Frakes
did a pretty good job with what he had.  Hope he can do another.
With that lovely note, I end this purging.  Thanks for reading.

Author
Michael J. Legeros
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
    The best thing about seeing a Star Trek movie is that when the
inevitable projection problem occurs, there's always someone more-
obsessive than yourself who gets up to go notify the management.  STAR
TREK: FIRST CONTACT is the perfect movie for those dedicated fans,
because they can project their own excitement into an otherwise talky
action movie.  Despite a strong script and an excellent ensemble cast,
there's a fundamental visceral tension that's missing here.  Or, rather,
which leaks out over time.  In fact, the most exciting moment in the
movie is a cabin-room confrontation between Patrick Stewart and Alfre
Woodard.  (How odd.  Even with the best FX in eight movies, FIRST
CONTACT is surprisingly thrill-less.) Everything else, however, is par
for the course:  in-jokes, one-liners (most of them hilarious), gizmos
with lots of flashing red and yellow lights, explosions heard in the
vacuum of space, and plenty of technical mumbo-gumbo like "we appear to
be caught in a temporal wake." By the end, the resolution of the lengthy
conflict (the Enterprise goes back in time to battle the Borg) makes
perfect logical sense and little else.  Next time, please reactivate the
emotion chip.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Author
Chuck Dowling
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Star Trek:First Contact (1996) ** out of ***** - C:Patrick Stewart,
Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton, Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden,
Marina Sirtis, James Cromwell, Alfre Woodard, Dwight Schultz, Robert
Picardo.
***This review does contain spoilers***
I was completely unprepared for how bad this movie is. After seeing about a
thousand commercials for the newest Star Trek adventure, I was sold.
Finally, Starfleet battles their dreaded enemy from the series, the Borg.
Finally, an action packed Star Trek movie which many had called "Die Hard on
the Enterprise". I was one of the first in line. Once it began, I couldn't
keep from wanting to leave.
If you are a casual Star Trek fan, you'll be lost from the first minute. If
you are a serious Star Trek fan, I think you'll feel cheated. First of all,
nothing is really explained in the film. As soon as the film starts, the
Borg attack. You aren't even given a second to settle into the film. And
after that it's just "kill the Borg". How are they doing it? Don't ask. Just
watch. Will it make sense? No. Just watch.
When we first see Geordi (Burton), he is no longer wearing his visor. He
apparently no longer needs it. Well when did that happen? In the last film,
the Enterprise was completely destroyed. So are we introduced to the new
ship as we were in the original Star Trek film? Nope, not even for a second.
When the Enterprise was destroyed in "The Search for Spock" and in
"Generations", you cared because the characters cared. Here, when the ship
is facing destruction, who cares? Blow it up. Starfleet has changed their
uniforms AGAIN, now they look like jumpsuits from the 1970s. Would you feel
safe being protected by an organization in charge of defending the universe
that can't even make up their minds about how to dress?
Also, none of the characters in the film even seem familiar anymore. Data
has emotions now, so he's just like anyone else. The rest of the crew is
given little or nothing to do. Captain Picard (Stewart) turns into a madman
upon encountering the Borg, because of events which took place during the
series' third and fourth seasons. Forget the fact that the Enterprise crew
encountered the Borg two more times after that in the series. They act as if
those seemingly important events never happened. I don't like that. It's
like I'm being lied to.
The Borg as an enemy seemed vicious in the series, but now they seem pretty
ridiculous. As smart and advanced as these things are, they still only
attack when provoked. This is how they always lose, because the crew just
stops fighting them and figures some other way to destroy them. The Borg
will just walk right by members of the crew as long as they aren't a direct
threat. Meanwhile those crew members keep on walking and eventually devise a
way to destroy them. This is a movie folks! You writers could have raised
the stakes just a little!
A Borg leader is introduced here, something which also seems to be a
contridiction from the series. Picard confronts her and tells her that he
destroyed her years ago. She admits that is true, but that humans need to
look beyond thinking 3 dimensionally, perhaps meaning that the Borg cannot
be killed by conventional means. But then, later in the film, she and the
other Borg are killed by some sort of gas that was contained in the engine
room, which had become their hive. (That poses the Wizard of Oz question: If
water killed you, why would you keep a bucket of it near you?) So what was
the point of all that discussion?
Also, in the TV series, the writers made a point to explain EVERYTHING, even
if it was just a technobabble explanation. Never once can I recall did I
question the logic of any episode of "The Next Generation". Here, they don't
bother to explain anything. The Borg have developed time travel
capabilities. They send only one ship to Earth (just as they did before, way
to learn from previous mistakes borgies) and then send a smaller ship back
in time upon reaching Earth. Well, the Enterprise is prepared for this
because they see it happening. Wouldn't it make sense to go back in time
BEFORE reaching Earth so no one knows you're doing it? Again, these "fierce"
enemies seem stupid.
There's a pointless time travel subplot which doesn't make any sense either.
Throughout the history of Star Trek, everyone always made a big deal about
time travel, about how not to interfere with events in the past. Well not
only does the crew interfere with MAJOR events, they actually participate in
them too! Ridiculous.
For a series which prided itself in continuity and details, it's shocking to
see that this film throws all of that out of the window. There's a Star Trek
novel called "Vendetta" which deals with the Borg, and that would have been
far superior to this. Maybe when making the next film, the filmmakers can
pretend that this one didn't happen. Why not? They got plenty of practice
ignoring their own history in this one.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Reply to: chuckd21@southeast.net
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office

Author
Timothy W. Lynch
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
In brief:  The best Trek film in fourteen years, possibly at all.  See it, 
and see it on as big a screen as possible; you won't regret it.
Written by:  Brannon Braga & Ronald D. Moore (screenplay); 
        Rick Berman & Brannon Braga & Ronald D. Moore (story) 
Directed by:  Jonathan Frakes
[NOTE:  normally for TNG and feature Star Trek reviews, I include a
detailed synopsis.  Under the assumption that readers of
rec.arts.movies.reviews and rec.arts.sf.reviews wouldn't be that
interested, this version does not include it.  Those wanting a review
with synopsis can look in r.a.startrek.reviews or
r.a.startrek.current, or check my FTP site at ftp.alumni.caltech.edu.
Those wanting a synopsis alone for some reason can check
r.a.startrek.info.]
Two years ago, when "Star Trek: Generations" premiered, I was 
beginning to harbor serious doubts about Trek as a franchise.  "Star 
Trek: the Next Generation" had recently finished its seventh season, 
which despite a few gems was a very uneven season; "Star Trek: Deep 
Space Nine" was in the middle of a terribly disappointing third season; 
"Star Trek: Voyager" didn't exist yet [which, as it turns out, was a 
blessing]; and "Generations" itself was, though reasonable, somewhat 
less than satisfying.
What a difference two years can make.  "Voyager" may be more or 
less beyond hope, but DS9 is back to producing enjoyable television 
(if not quite the sort it made in its first two years), and with "First 
Contact", the movie run of TNG looks to be rejuvenated.  
"First Contact" is quite unlike any Trek film that preceded it, and on 
the whole I think that's a good thing.  Even in the mid-21st-century 
setting that much of the film provides, there are no goofy fish-out-of-
water jokes that were so prevalent in the fourth film (and which, while 
funny once or twice, don't age well).  Also gone are some of the 
lackluster villains that have peppered the later films (neither ST3's 
Commander Kruge nor "Generations'" Dr. Soran particularly 
impressed me, and I refuse to discuss the fifth film's existence at all); 
and gone is the difficulty of making the characters believable after 
twenty-five years that plagued the last few films in the series featuring 
the original cast.
What's back successfully, for the first time since "Star Trek II: The 
Wrath of Khan", is a tortured personal core to the story.  (ST6 tried it, 
but backed away from it by the film's end.)  This one was also more 
difficult to pull off:  in ST2, Khan's obsessive pursuit of revenge was 
a serious threat to the heroes, but there was no challenge of making 
Khan sympathetic in the process.  Here, since Picard was the one 
feeling bloody-minded, there was a real risk of turning some of the 
audience away from the hero -- and given the years-long wait between 
films and the pervasive myth among some segments of fandom that 
Starfleet characters and the Federation must be perfect, that's a worry 
with considerable implications behind it.  "First Contact" took that risk 
and damned the consequences, which I can't help but applaud -- and 
it's a credit both to both the screenwriters and to Patrick Stewart that I 
find Picard even more interesting and worthwhile a character than I 
did before.
A lot of care was taken to make Picard's plight understandable both to 
long-time fans and to the more casual viewers.  For anyone who 
didn't know about Picard's past as Locutus of Borg, one's education 
began from the opening shot of the film, an extraordinary pullback 
showing Picard as the only wholly human face trapped in a 
monstrously large Borg cube.  Further elements, such as Starfleet's 
concern over whether Picard would be an "unstable element" during 
the Borg engagement -- a nontrivial concern that some fans had been 
asking about for years -- were brought in in a completely natural 
fashion.  I haven't talked to anyone yet about the film who wasn't a 
hardcore enough fan to know all that had gone before, but I've a 
feeling that the back-story would be clear even to them.
A way in which "First Contact" differs substantially from ST2 is that 
while the latter film had several themes in it -- revenge, age vs. youth, 
and several others -- they all revolved around one man, namely James 
T. Kirk.  "First Contact" branched out a bit more:  while Picard's 
quest for vengeance was a significant component of the film, so too 
was the Borg's attempted seduction of Data (in several senses of the 
word), and so too was Zefram Cochrane's confusion at becoming a 
legendary historical figure in the world he helped bring about.  As a 
result, the film was rather more complex than the second one, which I 
appreciate.
That complexity also applied to the plot, in spades:  while it wasn't 
quite on the level of Doc Brown having to take out a blackboard to 
explain the plot to the audience in "Back to the Future, Part II", there 
was a lot going on.  The early stages of the film, though, helped make 
that complexity a bit easier to grasp by being more straightforward:  
just about everything up to the discovery of assimilated crewmembers 
is not only linear, but downright inexorable.  It's a cinch that Picard is 
not going to stay on the sidelines forever, despite Starfleet's orders; 
it's equally expected that the Enterprise is going to follow the Borg 
back in time after the Borg have attempted (successfully, it would 
seem) to alter the course of history.  I've thought another working title 
for the film could have been "Full Circle", as the story wound all the 
way from the Trek "present" back to the dawn of the Federation 
without seeming cramped by its scale.  
The Earthbound side of the tale, with Our Heroes [tm] trying to 
persuade Zefram Cochrane to go ahead and create the history he 
already had been about to do (everybody got that?), was clearly the 
lighter side of the story, as a counterpoint to the relentlessly grim tale 
being spun aboard the Enterprise.  It wasn't all for laughs by any 
means, as the fate of the Federation was at stake and Cochrane did 
have to deal with his future; since that future was a bright one, 
though, there was little real sacrifice involved.  As such, the story 
there flowed more from the banter and the conversation than anything 
else, and more than ninety percent of it flowed quite well indeed.  
(The one line that fell really flat for me was "so you're saying you're 
astronauts, on some kind of star trek?"  Ow.  Ow ow ow.  Never 
write that again.)  Troi's drunk scene was far funnier than I expected, 
James Cromwell's performance as Cochrane was just over-the-top 
enough to be entertaining without descending into late-period Shatner, 
the repeated bursts of hero-worship made perfect sense (and with 
Dwight Schultz making a five-line or so cameo as Lt. Barclay, they 
worked even better), and the idea of having to build a better world out 
of the ruins of the old really felt ... well, almost inspiring.
On the Enterprise, on the other hand, the story started out dark and 
descended into the horrific in a way Trek's never done in a movie 
before.  Some of the early scenes (like the "something coming out of 
the shadows in engineering" bit) didn't do much for me, but once the 
initial takeover is complete and it's clear that Picard and company are 
at a major disadvantage, the story turned into one of desperation.  
Desperation and revenge work well together as themes, so I wasn't 
surprised to see them linked; regardless, though, the plot traveling 
from one long-shot to another actually had my heart pounding in a 
way no SF movie has done to me in quite some time.
As is perhaps typical for time travel stories, though, there were a few 
moments in the plot that made me very briefly say "wait a minute...", 
but surprisingly few.  I did wonder why no one suggested the idea of 
traveling back in time to just *before* the Borg arrived and destroying 
the ship then -- but as soon as the Borg presence on the Enterprise 
was known, that objection disappeared.  I wondered a little bit about 
the seeming coincidence of the Borg queen being one of the few Borg 
who made it back into the past and aboard the Enterprise, but given 
how overwhelmingly powerful the Borg are in many ways, I don't 
have many difficulties with accepting that they're going to manage a 
few things we just don't figure out.  The one concern I had that never 
quite went away is why Riker and Geordi accompanied Cochrane on 
his legendary flight; with every last detail of Cochrane's mission being 
studied by high school students in the future, you'd think they'd want 
to stay well out of sight.  Given the circumstances (such as Lily's 
absence, since I assume she'd have been in one of those two seats 
otherwise), it's justifiable, but that's one case where I think the 
justification should have been given.  (I also think the idea of Picard 
being able to hear the Borg in his mind should have been fleshed out a 
little more; it made sense overall, but I definitely had a few questions.)
On the character side, the two regular characters who were given the 
most to do were, not surprisingly, Picard and Data.  I've already 
mentioned Picard's revenge quest, but it was best brought out in the 
Picard/Lily confrontation in Picard's ready room.  When Picard tried 
to hide his desires behind his old platitude about how 24th-century 
humans have outgrown vengeance, I was cheering Lily's "bullshit!" 
cry in response.  Every single moment in that scene was not only 
watchable, but compelling:  from Picard's outburst where he breaks 
his "little ships", to the varied references to _Moby Dick_, to Picard's 
final realization that he may be sacrificing everything he has for a 
moment of pain, there really wasn't anything about that scene I'd 
change.
"The Last Temptation of Data" didn't come off quite as well, but it 
was extremely successful nonetheless.  Many of these plot points 
(Data being given flesh and being literally seduced by the Borg queen, 
for instance) are ones that I'd heard about months ago and really 
winced at; they sounded terrible.  Once it all got placed in context, 
though, it seemed chilling in the same way some of Bram Stoker's 
original _Dracula_ was:  sexuality (or, in this case, Data's entire 
humanity) as a curse.  Much of the credit for that has to go to both 
Brent Spiner and especially Alice Krige, who turned a character I was 
expecting to loathe into one I found compelling viewing, but some of 
it is really just waiting for the ideas to be placed in context.
Having praised Stewart, Spiner, Cromwell and Krige, I should also 
mention that Alfre Woodard did a strong job as Lily Sloane; I didn't 
find her performance quite as sterling as the others', but it was a near 
thing.  She only had two really major scenes, and both worked well:  
the "Ahab" one with Stewart I mentioned earlier, and the one where 
Picard reveals to her where she really is.  In the latter, she was the 
stand-in for the audience, giving us her own sense of wonder; and 
boy, did she ever.
(The rest of the cast?  Fine, but they didn't have all *that* much to do.  
They generally fared better than last time, though, with the exception 
of Gates McFadden, who again was left with only a few token 
scenes.)
That leaves the presentation:  visuals, music, direction, and so forth.  
In that respect, "First Contact" was absolutely stunning.  I've seen a 
lot of SF films in my time, but visually "First Contact" is probably the 
biggest treat since "Blade Runner", and the biggest treat set in space 
since "Star Wars" hit the big screen nearly twenty years ago.  There 
were several striking moments (the opening pullback being one, and 
the glorious shot of Picard, Worf, and Hawk striding out onto the 
underside of the ship being another, along with the entire more or less 
scientifically accurate zero-g combat sequence), and Frakes was very 
careful not to linger too long on them (which would risk turning parts 
of the movie into parts of the first Trek picture back in 1979).  The 
effects, the music and Frakes' direction combined to give a real sense 
of atmosphere to the assimilated Enterprise, and on the big screen it 
was tough not to let a certain feeling of awe seep in -- especially in the 
final scenes, where we finally get to see Earth's first contact with the 
Vulcans.
-- One of the ships in the initial Borg attack is the Bozeman.  I don't 
know if it's intended to be the same one we saw in "Cause and 
Effect", but it's certainly still Brannon Braga's hometown.  (And gee, 
Bozeman's in Montana.  Fancy that coincidence.)
-- Jerry Goldsmith put in a couple of musical stings that sounded 
familiar.  In the early scenes with Worf, he re-used the Klingon theme 
from "Star Trek: the Motion Picture" to good effect, and one of the 
early shots of the battle on the hull included a riff that sounded 
suspiciously like the early notes of "Also Sprach Zarathustra", of 
"2001: A Space Odyssey" fame.  
-- "2001" was clearly on the everyone's minds during that scene.  
While the magnetic locks are being eliminated, the graphic showing 
the program status refers to subunit "AE35"; in "2001", it's the AE-35 
unit which allegedly fails, thus throwing off contact with Earth.  Very 
cute.
-- Most of the cameo appearances worked well for me:  Schultz's 
quick turn as Barclay was a scream, and Ethan Phillips' human 
appearance as a bouncer in Picard's Dixon Hill scenario was cute.  I 
was less enchanted with Robert Picardo's guest appearance as the 
Emergency Medical Holographic program a la "Voyager"; the idea 
was fine, but the implication that this doctor has the same personality 
that the one on "Voyager" developed over the span of months is not.
-- And, on a personal note, there's one character now deceased whom 
I'd like to see return.  Who might that be?  The redoubtable, yet 
tragically assimilated, machine-gunned, and mutilated Ensign Lynch.  
I know the name's coincidence -- but hey, I can still be amused by it.  
:-)
That would seem to cover it.  (Whew.)  So, some closing summaries:
Writing:  A few small unanswered questions or muddled moments 
        here and there, but startlingly few for such an ambitious story.  
        Nicely done.
Directing:  Not bad for a big-screen rookie.  :-)  Keep him.
Acting:  Kudos to all.
OVERALL:  I probably should make it something like a 9.5, but I 
can't resist giving an extra half-point for the Ensign Lynch cameo :-), 
so it's a 10.  Bravo; would that they all could be like this.
Tim Lynch (Harvard-Westlake School, Science Dept.)
tlynch@alumni.caltech.edu        
--
Copyright 1996, Timothy W. Lynch.  All rights reserved, but feel free to ask...
This article is explicitly prohibited from being used in any off-net
compilation without due attribution and *express written consent of the
author*.  Walnut Creek and other CD-ROM distributors, take note.

Author
Mark R. Leeper
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
          Capsule: The newest "Star Trek" adventure is an
     okay science fiction piece lacking in some of the
     absurdities from which the "Star Trek" films have
     occasionally suffered.  The first of the series without
     William Shatner finds Patrick Stewart a more than
     adequate replacement on the screen.  The script needed a
     little tightening, but the Borg turn out to be a good,
     if familiar-seeming screen foe.  Rating: high +1 (-4 to
     +4)
     To this point the "Star Trek" films have either had reasonable
action but scripts that have shown far too little thought to the
concepts (numbers 2-4, 6 and STAR TREK: GENERATIONS).  Or have had
intriguing ideas wasted on poor execution (1 and 5).  STAR TREK: FIRST
CONTACT falls into the first category, but is blessedly free of ill-
conceived ideas like the Genesis Device or the Nexus.  The Borg at one
time added desperately-needed tension to the "Star Trek" suite of
series by introducing an enemy that was at once orders of magnitude
more powerful than the Federation ships and as implacable as a nest of
ants.  The Borg underscored that space exploration was still dangerous
and that whatever the current Enterprise was, it still had limitations.
However, whatever value that property represented has long since been
mortgaged in episodes that showed in a fair fight the Universe has
nothing--not even the Borg--that can stand up to the Enterprise, and
individual Borgs can be won over by niceness.  Some dim bulbs in the
"Star Trek" factory have safely established that we never need to worry
about "Star Trek" characters again. Vulcans return from the dead and
new Enterprises come in convenient six-packs, so we can safely ignore
the series and give our primary attention to "Babylon 5."  With the
concept of the Borg already compromised, they seem fair game to use in
a film.  In large part they are reduced here to NIGHT OF THE LIVING
DEAD style zombies with electronic enhancements they do not seem to
use, but then the concept has already been compromised.
     In the new film the Borg have an unusual strategy for assimilating
Earth.  They go back in time to just before that momentous day in the
21st Century--and who can forget it?--April 5, 2063 when both Zephram
Cochran (James Cromwell of BABE) took the first warp jump and as a
result Earth also makes its first contact with an alien race.  It is
amazing that both happened in one day and even more that nobody in any
of the series or films has ever mentioned that fact till now.  If the
Borg can manage to abort the first warp trip and the first alien
contact, apparently everything else will be okay for them.  And their
arrival has to be just within hours of the flight and not two weeks
earlier because ... uh ...  well, maybe the Borg are not quite so smart
after all.  To the rescue in their time-travel wake comes the
Enterprise commanded by Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart, of I,
CLAUDIUS and JEFFREY).  He is here against the express orders of the
Federation in a move that would be more characteristic of James Kirk
than of Picard.
     In the new "Star Trek" tradition of giving the directorial reins
to an aspiring "Star Trek" actor, the task went to Jonathan Frakes, who
is perhaps one of the least noticeable actors in this film.  He is in
some major scenes but is only noticeable when he seems to be grinning
at the joke of him directing himself. But Frakes has always been a
little redundant in the Next Generation stories.  He was thrown into
the cast because the creators knew that there could be no romantic
interest in a bald middle-aged captain.  Then Stewart demonstrated far
more appeal than anyone expected.  Speaking of whom I am not sure if it
is meaningful to talk about whether Patrick Stewart is a good Captain
Picard, but he is.  Stewart is the best actor who was ever a regular in
the "Star Trek" stories and his is the most interesting character.
There are a few other familiar actors sprinkled in (besides the regular
cast), but none to very good advantage. James Cromwell plays a sort of
working class physics genius in a role that never really gels.  He is
never believable as the inventor of warp drive, which is perhaps the
point of the joke, but it just adds to the question of how with so
little resource, physical as well as mental, could this particular
person putter together warp drive.  Alfre Woodard is totally wasted in
a throwaway role.  Alice Krige, best remembered for GHOST STORY has
only slightly less thankless a role as the one-dimensional punk-looking
queen bee of the Borg.
     This episode is not just darker in tone than many of the chapters,
it is literally darker in lighting.  In the entire film there are just
two scenes that come to mind that are filmed in daylight.  This,
combined with the somewhat repulsive Borg and their queen who, as a
possible homage to INVADERS FROM MARS, is little more than a head gives
the film a decidedly colder and more dour feel.  This could be a
positive touch, but it really undermines the attempted humor scenes.
It is hard to imagine Marina Sirtis doing a drunk act being funny even
under the best of conditions, here it does not stand a chance.   Visual
effects are generally fairly good with the exception of some zero-G
floating that would have been unconvincing even before the release of
APOLLO 13.  Jerry Goldsmith has written a nice score incorporating
themes from other "Star Trek" series and films but also including some
new themes.
     This is a "Star Trek" episode with its share of faults, but few
that come to mind while watching it.  It has the melodrama of other
episodes of the films but fewer absurdities this time around.  Oh, and
it is entertaining.  I rate it a high +1 on the -4 to +4 scale.
     Minor spoiler...Minor spoiler...Minor spoiler...Minor spoiler...
     Some complaints about the script.  I have avoided reading
discussions on the net so some of there may have already been brought
up there without my knowledge.
     1. Even a few minutes of warp should have taken a ship a lot
further from Earth than it was.  Presumably warp speed is faster than
light if not out and out discontinuous jumping.
     2. The claim in made that in the 25th century they no longer use
money.  This is patently inconsistent with STAR TREK: DEEP SPACE 9.
People are spending and gambling something in Quark's Bar. Gold-pressed
latinum is also frequently mentioned and used as money.
     3. Data turning off his emotion chip by twisting his head is a
nice piece of mime, but it makes little sense.
     4. It really reduces the Borg to a very unintelligent level to say
they do not even notice intruders in their midst.  Even ants are
smarter than that with far smaller brains.
     5. There are two strategies to use against the Borg and Picard
chooses one because he has an unreasoning hatred of the Borg.  Someone
who really had an unreasoning hatred of the Borg would have chosen the
other strategy.
     6. Admittedly complaining about holodeck sequences is like
tripping a dachshund, but this one seems especially stupid.  The
holodeck in principle creates only visual effects.  It would take a lot
of double-talk to make it sound possible that anyone could actually be
shot by a visual illusion and bleed real blood.
     7. The Universal Translator already sounds like magic assuming
that it needs a lot of input about a new race.  It goes considerably
further to say that it knows the new language instantly with virtually
no sampling.

Author
J. C. Gibson
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
FIRST CONTACT! Major spoilers ahoy! Just let me say that it was really
cool. :)
This movie will be a hit. I can tell because I took some family
members who are about as far from being a Trekker as I am from being
President. They loved it. I, OTOH, was slightly disappointed, now, I
*did* love the movie, I was just expecting *more*. It happened the
same way with ID4, TPTB hyped it up for ages before it came, then,
when we finally saw it, we realized that all those scenes shown in the
trailers and "making of's" *were* all the scenes.
I for one, was expecting more battles, and more action. Now, I enjoy
the "Visitor" type as much (possibly more!) as anyone else, but as
someone said, this movie was just too short. When I looked at my watch
at the end, only about an hour and a half had passed. I'm not sure why
they didn't make it longer, but it hurt it badly. Too much was left
unsaid. And as another person said, I got the feeling that the ground
was more important than the ship at times. This would have been better
if they would have portrayed ZC the way we *thought* he was, so he
wouldn't have needed all this coddling. If they would have knocked out
that stupid chase through the forest, they would have had a few more
seconds for the ships.
The *ship* was the part we needed. It seemed like everytime I was
starting to get *really* into the Borg and those neat corridors, they
instantly cut back to the surface and my adreniline went back down to
normal levels. In order for this to have really worked, they needed to
spend *all* of that "middle" time on the ship, and just had ZC's
launch and First Contact with the Vulcans. (I wonder why they stayed
after ZC's music blasted them to kingdom come? :) This would have
worked fine.
I also hate to say this, but when the BQ fell into that flesh-eating
smog at the end, all I could think about was that this was a
poor-man's "Alien". Remember "Alien 3"?  I also found myself
staring at the Borg being "refreshed" along the corridors, because in
a "making of" I saw Jonathan Frakes (I think?) say "take that" and
knock one of them over! I couldn't help wondering which ones were the
dummies. (to the SFX peoples' credit, I couldn't tell)
I personally hated the uniforms before the movie, but when I saw it, I
liked them. They fit in the "battle-like" E-E, and I dare say, the
same will happen with the "darker" DS9. DS9 is sort of the same
"fighting" machine as the E-E, "darker" than your average Starfleet
ship. Gunmetal gray instead of silver. *BUT* I sure as heck hope that
they keep them away from Voyager. Not only would that be a pitiful
plot device, but they wouldn't *look* right in the "cheerful"
atmosphere of the Voyager.
I also didn't think I'd like the design of the E-E, but as soon as I
saw it swooping across that beautiful starfield to join the battle
with the Borg, I knew it was *her*. She's sleeker and more gorgeous
than the squat looking E-D. (and before you flame me, I *love* the
E-D, she'll always be "TNG's ship". I'm just talking about design.) I
personally cannot wait until I can put together a model of her. 
Love at first sight.
Finally, I really spoiled this movie for myself, I had found out about
all the little cameos and things like Hawke dying months ago. I didn't
think knowing these little things would hurt the movie as long as I
stayed away from plots and major spoilers. I was wrong. :( I went with
a friend, and when they ooohed and aaahed at Ethan Phillips, Robert
Picardo, and Dwight Schultz, and looked horrified at Hawke's demise, I
was kicking myself, because it wasn't *special* to me. I'm sure other
people did the same thing, can we get together and kick each other's
a**es?
Oh, and just to make a list of my favorite scenes, here goes:
1. That goregous opening scene when the E-E came swooping down in all
her glory. The FX there were beautiful. As Scotty would say, "It
brough' a tear to me eye, laddie."
2. The scene with the Defiant zooming across the screen in front of
the Borg ship. Wow.
3. When we saw the E-E warp back home from down below on Earth. Loved
that.
4. Borg Queen's entrence. The head meeting the body. (But, if anybody
here went to Disney World way,way back in the 80's, didn't that
chamber remind you of that Epcot 3-D movie "Captain EO"? The one with
Michael Jackson doing the moonwalk? It just reminded me of that,
especially when Picard was climbing all those tubes. Sorry if you have
no idea what I'm babbling about :)
5. The look on Lily's face when she realized she was in space was
priceless :)
6. The Picard/Worf "coward" exchange. Sisko better watch out, I don't
know if he would qualify as "If you were any other man.." 
7. When Data says he was only tempted for ".0068 seconds, an eternity
for androids," I was ROFLOL.
8. When the Vulcan gave the "Live long and prosper" hand, and ZC
couldn't do it. That was great.
I could go on and on. Suffice it to say:  I loved this movie, I think
it will keep Trek alive, but I don't think it was as good as "Wrath of
Khan" or "Undiscovered Country". Their stories just made more sense.
When you work with time travel, you open up too many cans of worms.
Time has only really worked *right* a few times, DS9's "The Visitor"
is one I can think of off the bat, and that didn't even really have
"time travel". But maybe I'm just a sourpuss :) Let's see, I can still
catch the 1:00 showing if I run...
Out of 5 stars, I give this a 4 1/2. Congrats to all who worked on it.
- Trek Tech, who got the *last* "Resistence Is Futile" button in the
theater! My lucky day! 

Author
Scott Renshaw
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT
(Paramount)
Starring:  Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton,
Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden, Marina Sirtis, Alice Krige, Alfre Woodard,
James Cromwell.
Screenplay:  Ronald D. Moore and Brannon Braga.
Producer:  Rick Berman.  
Director:  Jonathan Frakes.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (profanity, violence)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Paramount's "Star Trek" franchise needs the current crew much more
than the crew needs the franchise, and that is something of a shift in the
balance of power from the original crew.  With the surviving "Trek"
television series -- "Deep Space Nine" and "Voyager" -- in ratings free
fall and the original cast finally retired, the film projects with the
"Next Generation" cast are the last, best hope for the survival of Gene
Roddenberry's beloved vision.  To be even more specific, the franchise
needs Patrick Stewart.  Far and away the best actor ever to don a
Starfleet uniform, Stewart is the standard bearer for a series which has
the opportunity to thrive as long as stories can be built around Captain
Jean-Luc Picard, a character with unlimited potential in the hands of such
a talented performer.
     STAR TREK: FIRST CONTACT is built around Stewart's Picard, which is
the first of many things the eighth TREK feature does right.  Picard is
leading the newly commissioned Enterprise E when the alien Borg -- a race
of cybernetic beings whose only purpose is the conquest and assimilation
of other races -- attack the Federation.  The Enterprise, however, is
asked to stay out of the fray, since the admirals don't quite trust Picard
to remain objective about a race which once captured and assimilated him.
Their concerns are validated when Picard joins the battle anyway, and ends
up following a Borg ship into the past, where they intend to conquer the
earth the easy way.  In the mid 21st century, the Borg plan to prevent the
maiden warp-drive flight of Zefram Cochrane (James Cromwell), which brings
earth into contact with benevolent alien races for the first time.  It is
up to the Enterprise crew to make sure that flight takes place, despite a
Borg takeover of the Enterprise itself and the surprising reluctance of
Cochrane.
     The STAR TREK films have often walked a fine line between being
love-ins for the die-hard fans of the television series and accessible
adventures for a general audience, and FIRST CONTACT walks an even finer
line than most.  Though brief flashbacks and bits of exposition explain
the nature of Picard's previous encounter with the Borg, familiarity with
the episodes of the series in which it took place makes his trauma much
more clear, and his obsession more compelling.  There are obligatory
cameos as well (including one "Voyager" cast member) which will likely
blow right over the heads of the uninitiated, and at least one moment
which will be a Trekker delight:  the generally serene Counselor Troi
(Marina Sirtis) drunk on tequila shots.  Still, the surprisingly effective
work of first-time feature film director Jonathan Frakes (who also
portrays Commander William Riker) makes FIRST CONTACT a solid, suspenseful
action film for any fan of the genre, particularly in a tense encounter
between Borg and crew members which takes place on the hull of the
Enterprise.
     If there is likely to be a disappointment for Trek fans, it is a
change in the nature of the Borg which works to mixed effect.  The
anonymous and group-conscious Borg are given a much more individualized
queen (Alice Krige) who acts as their mouthpiece in their interaction with
crew members, notably the captured Commander Data (Brent Spiner).  Krige
is creepy and seductive in the role, and the design of her character is
sensational, but something is lost in giving the Borg a de facto leader.
Writers Ronald D. Moore and Brannon Braga attempt to explain it away in
classic Trek fashion -- it is one of those mysteries, the queen rasps,
which limited minds simply can't understand -- but they are unable to
explain away a Borg which seems concerned about its own individual
survival.  Somehow, they become less frightening as an army than as a
single entity.
     Krige is nasty enough, however, to make such matters insignificant
while you're watching FIRST CONTACT, and she is part of a phenomenon which
makes this TREK somewhat unique:  the acting is good enough from top to
bottom to drive the film.  James Cromwell (BABE) gets the entertaining
role of Cochrane, a self-interested sot who finds himself terribly
uncomfortable with the notion that he will be considered a hero by
history; it is a comic performance which is not simply comic relief.  The
always-reliable Alfre Woodard is also on hand as Cochrane's colleague
Lily, and Spiner (whose Data persona has been the best cushion against his
tendency to over-act) has some choice moments with Krige.  But it is
Stewart who commands both literally and figuratively, making his personal
mission to destroy the Borg a solid sub-text to a conventional action
film.  It takes conviction to sell science fiction, and Stewart is an
actor simply unwilling to play a flat character.  Frakes keeps the story
flowing while switching between the various plot threads, and his steady
hand helps make FIRST CONTACT the best TREK since 1986's STAR TREK IV:
THE VOYAGE HOME, and shows that it is far too early to begin the eulogy
for this franchise.  This is a smart and snappy adventure in which Patrick
Stewart doesn't just say "Make it so" -- he does it.

Author
Robin Starvling
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Star Trek First Contact: rename it STAR TREK FIRST CONTRIVEMENT
There will be spoilers, but how can one spoil a movie worse than this?
The movie takes place about a year after the last one. There's a whole
new ship, a whole new crew of extras, brand new uniforms and Geordi
suddenly has brand new eyes. No explanation. We're to take it for
granted.
The Borg have arrived at Earth and plan to assimilate it. The Federation
orders their brand new flagship to hide out in the Neutral Zone because
they're afraid Picard might get assimilated again. He of course gets
sick of this when news travels back saying that the entire fleet can't
stop them.
Predicatable. Off they go in the new ship to save the day. They get
there and suddenly Picard knows if everyone shoots at the same place,
it'll blow up the borg ship. Why didn't he know this before? And how
come Picard can suddenly hear them? Still a few implants in his brain
that Doctor Crusher overlooked?
The Borg head towards Earth and suddenly go temporal. They head back in
time. The Enterprise goes after them. At least they didn't mention
anything about whales this time.
The tale drags on. A landing party goes down to fix temporal changes
made by the Borg, The Enterprise gets infiltrated and Data, Worf and
Picard try to stop them. Deanna gets drunk (the only tolerable scene in
which either Sirtis or McFadden get any kind of center stage time) and
after a number of predicatable and contrived plot developments and tried
and proven lines of dialogue, Picard saves the day after being compared
to Captain Ahab of Moby Dick.
The dialogue is stilted. Jonathan Frakes should have spent more time
behind the camera and less in front of it. He "acts" like Frakes, not
Riker. Worf's "assimilate this" rang of Terminator influence. Data's
romantic trist with the Borg Queen was forced and uninteresting.
Gates McFadden as Doctor Crusher once again is given nothing to do,
which again is predictable. All they did in Star Trek Generations was
have Data push her into the ocean and give her a cold. She conveniently
disappears after practically a cameo role in both pictures.
I went to IRC to see if I was the only one who disliked it. I found
myself in the minority. To the point of being kicked out of the #trek
channel after being invited by a CAPTMARY specifically for talk about
the new movie. A little disagreement and suddenly I'm an outcast. Again
predictable.
Guess Paramount is right. Stamp ST on something and the Trek masses will
buy it in truckloads. This is not worth buying. The special effects were
great, but you could say that about the first ST movie, which is one of
the worst of the eight they've ever made.
If you haven't seen it yet, DON'T. Don't believe the hype. Don't even
wait till it comes on video. It's forced, contrived, and predictable. It
utilizes variations of many plot devices tried and proven in previous
shows. It's a poor excuse not only for an ST movie, but any movie
whatsoever.
Unless of course you want to be assimilated into the ST cash cow, then
by all means give in to it.

Author
Mikkel Lodahl
Star Trek: First Contact
Directed by: Jonathan Frakes
Story by: Rick Berman, Brannon Braga and Ronald D. Moore
Screenplay by: Brannon Braga and Ronald D. Moore
Music by: Jerry Goldsmith
The thought that ran through my mind upon completing my viewing of this
flick was: "Thank God that I've seen Star Trek: The Next Generation
[hereafter: ST:TNG] before!" While the movie might be entertaining to the
non-initiated (in fact, if my memory serves me correctly, a friend of mine
thought it very good in spite of his lack of Trek-knowledge), it grows
multiple times
richer when you know some back-story. It doesn't even have to be a lot, but
I'd recommend seeing at least the two-parter "The Best of Both Worlds" from
the ST: TNG series, which I recommend heartily.
Anyhow, the plot revolves around Captain Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart;
Jeffrey),
who captains the oh-so-legendary starship U.S.S. Enterprise. A, to
non-initiates,
quite confusing prologue to the film tries to explain that Picard was once
part of
an alien cyber-collective named "The Borg", but fails to bring it about in a
totally
clear fashion. No problem, though, as it does validate the use of a
spectacular
matte painting depicting the interior of a Borg ship. "Cool," you think,
"What now?"
The film progresses at an amazingly quick pace, which has us involved in a
space
battle above Earth within the first fifteen minutes of the flick. The Borg
are back with a
vengence, it seems, and they want to assimilate all of Human culture into
their
collective, just as they assimilated Picard. While the quick pace easily
could have
been terribly wrong, it somehow feels right. The filmmakers seems to believe
that
we either know these characters well, and therefore don't need an
introduction,
or that we don't care. And, surprisingly, it works. My fore-amentioned
friend just
jumped on the rollercoaster so to speak, and went along for the ride.
And what a ride? A terrific one! After some nice effects showing how Picard
singlehandedly uses an unorthodox strategy to blow up the Borg ship, a small
contingent of Borg soldiers escape in a ball-like escape pod. They create
some
kind of temporal shift or other, and go back in time to the 21st century.
The Enterprise, protected by their closeness to this temporal thinggummy
sees
the horrible changes inflicted on the future by this: Earth has been
assimilated into
the Borg Collective. Picard decides that they should follow the Borg back to
"repair whatever damage they've done."
It just so happens that the Borg chose to go back to when humankind invented
warp-drive (faster than light travel) and tries to stop the invention. The
Enterprise
readily blows up the Borg Escape Pod, and an away team beams down to Earth
to see what damage the Borg has caused yet. Down there, Picard and company
discover that the Borg bombarded the home of Dr. Zefraim Cochrane
(James Cromwell; L. A. Confidential), the inventor of warp-drive. Meanwhile,
the
Borg have beamed over to the Enterprise and starts to assimilate the whole
ship.
Picard and his android sidekick, Commander Data (Brent Spiner; Independence
Day)
beams back to the Enterprise just before the Borg take control of most of
the systems
onboard, though not of the main computer.
And then the rest of the movie goes along smoothly. While Picard and Data,
aided by
Commander Worf (Michael Dorn; Deep Space 9 series) and a 21st century
"native" who
has been beamed up for medical treatment (Alfre Woodard; Grand Canyon) by
the
on-board Dr. Crusher (Gates McFadden), battle with the Borg, first officer
Commander Riker (Jonathan Frakes), ship's counselor Deanna Troi (Marina
Sirtis),
and chief engineer Geordi LaForge (Levar Burton) tries to talk Cochrane into
cunducting
the warp-flight at the planned date, because else, they'll miss a passing
alien ship that will
contact Earth when it observes warp-speed in use.
The movie is spectacular, and is in my opinion among the best Star Trek has
ever created,
right up there with "The Wrath of Khan" and "The Voyage Home" Jonathan
Frakes does a
good job directing; there is hardly a place where I would have done
differently. All of the cast
delivers no worse than decent performances; Patrick Stewart, Brent Spiner
and
James Cromwell shining particularly. While the film does have a few of the
time-travel jokes
that were decidedly overused in The Voyage Home, they don't feel forced, and
are actually
worth a chuckle or two. The effects are stunningly created by Industrial
Light and magic, who
are without any doubt the leading in their field - and they prove it here.
Worth of mention is also the performance of Alice Krige (Barfly) who plays
the evil leader of
the Borg; the Borg Queen.  While this concept falls flat in theory, it works
beautifully in function.
The Queen captures Data somewhat half-way through the film and then proceeds
to try to
bribe him into revealing the code that unlocks the main computer, offering
him humanity. Spiner
and Krige play well off each other and the scenes are all a joy to see
[except for one, very brief
scene, where there's thankfully only one line - "We've had a change of
plans, Data"]. For some
reason I detest that scene.
The question is, then, how well does this flick carry on the TNG feeling?
Very well I think. While the
story quite clearly focuses on Picard and Data, it seems like all the
characters are pretty much
having as much screen time as they had in a typical episode of TNG. (With
the possible exception of
Dr. Crusher, who seems to be there only to have all of the cast in there)
The characters are captured
well, as they should be considering the source (Both Braga and Moore were
staff writers at TNG), and
the actors seem to have fun doing the film, and that reflects on the
performance quite more than one
should think. No-one gives a bad performance in this film (I would say that
Robert Picardo, who has a
cameo as a hologram, does, but that's just me hating his character [the
hologram, that is :-)]).
The music was composed chiefly by one of my most favorite film composers,
namely Jerry Goldsmith.
"Chiefly" means that Joel Goldsmith, Jerry's son, composed three of the
tracks. The music lives up to
my expectations, underlining all the scenes that need underlining, and
actually quite good on its own too.
I particularly enjoyed the piece "Red Alert" which plays during the first
battle against the Borg. Also present,
besides the orchestral soundtrack, is two songs included to provide
atmosphere. One is the classic
"Magic Carpet Ride" performed by Steppenwolf (Born To Be Wild), the other an
early rock n' roll tune
by Roy Orbinson (Pretty Woman), namely "Ooby Dooby". Both of these play at
the discretion of Cochrane,
and "Ooby Dooby" could be considered his theme. Overall, a solid soundtrack
well worth a purchase.
This movie, while being a must for Trekkies and ordinary fans of Star Trek,
is also quite a ride for the
odd Sci-fi fan who isn't all too much in on the Trek franchise (though who
that would be, is a question
worthy of a much longer essay). I'm in doubt where to rate this, so I'll
provide two different ratings:
